[HomeBlue.gif] [EmbBlue.gif]
Afghanistan
Africa
AIDS
The Americas
Arms Control/ Non-Proliferation
Balkans
Biotechnology/ Food Safety
China/East Asia/Pacific
Climate Change
Death Penalty
Defense Democracy/Human Rights/Religious Freedom
Development
Drugs
Economy and Trade
Education
E-Government
Election Reform
Environment/Energy
Europe/Russia/NIS
Foreign Policy
Global Issues Health
ICC/Peace Keeping
IT/E-Commerce
International Security
Middle East
Missile Defense
NATO
South Asia
Terrorism
United Nations
U.S. Society and Values
Afghanistan
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page U.S. Support for Afghan Women, Children, and Refugees - June 2003
Source: U.S. Dept of State, July 16, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The job of reconstructing Afghanistan and thereby creating an environment that allows Afghan women to participate fully in the political, economic and social life of liberated Afghanistan is far from over, but the 2003 Report to Congress shows that progress is well underway and that life is better now than it was a year ago for many Afghans.
AFGHANISTAN: ARE WE LOSING THE PEACE? [Chairmens Report of an Independent Task Force]
Source: Council on Foreign Relations and the Asia Society, Project Executive Directors, Frank G. Wisner II, Nicholas Platt, and Marshall M. Bouton, Co-Chairs; Dennis Kux and Mahnaz Ispahani, June 18, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The task force report argues that to prevent a return to anarchy, Washington needs to bolster the Karzai government's ability to bring security and economic hope to the people of Afghanistan.
The report makes three principal recommendations to achieve these goals: 1) Improve security by extending peacekeeping efforts beyond Kabul and accelerating development of the Afghan National Army (ANA); 2) Increase pressure on neighboring countries not to undercut the Karzai government by backing warlords or failing to curb pro-Taliban remnants; and 3) Provide at least $1 billion in reconstruction assistance for each of the next five years.
Afghanistan: Seeds of Hope Afghanistan: Seeds of Hope
Source: U.S. Dept of State, June 10, 2003 USG: Official Publications
"We've seen in Afghanistan that the road to freedom can be hard; it's a hard struggle.
We've also seen in Afghanistan that the road to freedom is the only one worth traveling.
Any nation that sacrifices to build a future of liberty will have the respect, the support, and the friendship of the United States of America."
-- President George W. Bush --
Adobe Acrobat version | html version
Democracy and Islam in the New Constitution of Afghanistan
Source: RAND, Khaled M. Abou El Fadl, Said Arjomand, Nathan Brown, Jerrold Green, Donald Horowitz, Michael Rich, Barnett Rubin, Birol Yesilada, Cheryl Benard and Nina Hachigian, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This study reports on a conference held to identify ways in which the new constitution of Afghanistan could help put the country on the path to a strong, stable democracy characterized by good governance and rule of law.
The participants identified practical ideas for those involved in drafting the constitution, particularly about the treatment of Islam.
Afghanistan Post-Conflict Environment Assessment Report
Source: UNEP, Jan. 30, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The U.N. Environment Program (UNEP) released a study January 30 documenting extensive environmental damage in Afghanistan brought on by war, drought and deprivation.
These problems must be addressed if recovery is to be successful, according to the UNEP Post-Conflict Environment Assessment.
Africa
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page Ituri: "Covered in Blood": Ethnically Targeted Violence In Northeastern DR Congo
Source: Human Rights Watch, July 8, 2003 Non-USG Publication
According to Human Rights Watch, this report provides evidence that combatants in the Ituri region of northeastern Democratic Republic of Congo (DRC) have slaughtered some five thousand civilians in the last year because of their ethnic affiliation.
But the combatants are armed and often directed by the governments of the DRC, Rwanda and Uganda.
A number of treaties and ceasefires, the most recent signed in Burundi on June 19, have supposedly ended the conflict between the governments of Uganda, Rwanda, and the DRC, as well as Congolese rebel movements set to share power with the Kinshasa government.
But the minor playersoften the proxies for the principalscontinue the war.
THE AFRICA MALARIA REPORT 2003
Source: World Health Organization (WHO) and UNICEF, April 25, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This report - the first of its kind - takes stock of the malaria situation and of continuing efforts to tackle the disease in Africa; it is based on a review of the best information available to WHO and UNICEF, from sample surveys and routine reports, at the end of 2002.
Malaria continues to be a major impediment to health in Africa south of the Sahara, where it frequently takes its greatest toll on very young children and pregnant women.
Because malaria is such a common disease and well known to the people it affects most, and because many of those who become sick with malaria do not visit health care facilities, assessing the size of the problem, and how it is changing over time, is an enormous challenge.
New analyses confirm that malaria is a principal cause of at least one-fifth of all young child deaths in Africa.
The latest available data on outpatient visits and on hospital admissions and deaths due to malaria confirm that this disease makes substantial demands on Africa's fragile health infrastructure.
In endemic countries, as many as one-third of all clinic visits and at least a quarter of all hospital admissions are for malaria.
In some countries, these data suggest that illness due to malaria has increased over the past decade; in others, the size of the problem has remained constant.
No country in Africa south of the Sahara for which data are available shows a substantial decline.
Zimbabwes Manmade Crisis
Source: U.S. Dept of State, March 12, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Zimbabwe's President Robert Mugabe "has brought the country of Zimbabwe untold suffering," Deputy Assistant Secretary of State for Democracy, Human Rights and Labor J. Scott Carpenter told a news briefing at the State Department March 13.
He was joined in the briefing by Principal Deputy Assistant Secretary of State for African Affairs Mark Bellamy.
more
AIDS
---
The Americas
---
Arms Control/Non-Proliferation
PREVENTING THE MISUSE OF PATHOGENS: THE NEED FOR GLOBAL BIOSECURITY STANDARDS
Source: Arms Control Association, Jonathan B. Tucker, June 2003 Non-USG Publication
Negotiating global standards that restrict access to dangerous pathogens would reduce the threat of bioterrorism, while reinforcing the legal prohibitions on the development, production, and stockpiling of biological and toxin weapons contained in the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention (BWC).
Since its inception, the credibility of the BWC has been undermined by its lack of formal mechanisms for monitoring and verification, and efforts over the past decade to strengthen the treaty have been largely unsuccessful.
Since international terrorist organizations are likely to seek biowarfare materials from the most accessible source, international biosecurity standards would reduce the risk that terrorists could obtain dangerous pathogens from foreign laboratories and culture collections.
Harmonized guidelines for transferring pathogens would also facilitate collaborative research and development on biodefense vaccines and drugs.
Joint U.S.-Russian research projects on defenses against anthrax and smallpox, for example, have been hampered by incompatible national regulations on the export of dangerous pathogens.
MEETING THE NORTH KOREAN NUCLEAR CHALLENGE: REPORT OF AN INDEPENDENT TASK FORCE SPONSORED BY THE COUNCIL ON FOREIGN RELATIONS
Source: Council on Foreign Relations (CFR), Morton I. Abramowitz, James T. Laney and Eric Heginbotham, May 19, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Despite some convergence of positions within the allied camp, significant differences remain, limiting the effectiveness of policies adopted by each.
Washington favors a policy of isolation while Seoul pursues one of engagement.
American friends and allies in the region part ways with the United States over how to manage the nuclear crisis and ultimately induce change in the North.
Regional partners fear that the United States will attack North Korean nuclear facilities and unleash war on the peninsula.
All of these states, particularly South Korea and China, tend to oppose anything resembling comprehensive sanctions for fear that an embargo would lead to war as North Korea has threatened.
WHAT DOES DISARMAMENT LOOK LIKE?
Source: White House, Jan. 23, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Bush administration has charged the Iraqi regime of Saddam Hussein with using an exhaustive program of concealment and deceit, staffed by thousands of Iraqis, to prevent U.N. weapons inspectors from finding elements of its vast weapons of mass destruction program, according to a new White House report.
Challenge for the Bush Administration: Dealing with a Nuclear North Korea
Source: Brookings Institution, Jan. 14, 2003 Non-USG Publication
"In this verbatim transcript of a discussion at the Brookings Institution, a panel of experts addresses a number of difficult questions and long-term repercussions of North Korea's belligerent stance, including the following: Why did North Korea revive its nuclear weapons program? Was it to pressure the United States into resuming desperately needed humanitarian shipments of food and fuel? Why has the United States taken two different approaches to thwarting the weapons programs of Iraq and North Korea? What military optionsif anydoes the United States have in North Korea? How can the Bush administration conduct a "dialogue" with North Korea and still maintain its announced policy of not making "concessions"? What role will China and Russia play in finding a peaceful resolution to the crisis?"
North Koreas Nuclear Weapons Program
Source:CRS Report for Congress, Larry A. Niksch, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Jan. 7, 2003 USG: Official Publications
"North Koreas decision in December 2002 to restart nuclear installations at Yongbyon that were shut down under the U.S.- North Korean Agreed Framework of 1994 creates an acute foreign policy problem for the United States.
North Koreas major motive appears to be to escalate pressure on the Bush Administration to negotiate over Pyongyangs proposed non-aggression pact and/or a new nuclear agreement that would provide new U.S. benefits to North Korea.
However, restarting the Yongbyon facilities opens up a possible North Korean intent to stage a nuclear breakout of its nuclear program and openly produce nuclear weapons within six months.
North Koreas actions follow the disclosure in October 2002 that North Korea is operating a secret nuclear program based on uranium enrichment and the decision by the Korean Peninsula Energy Development Organization (KEDO) in November 2002 to suspend shipments of heavy oil to North Korea."
Options for Dealing with North Korea
Source: CATO, Ted Galen Carpenter, Foreign Policy Briefing No. 73, Jan. 6, 2003 Non-USG Publication
"Various options have been presented for how the U.S. might deal with the threat of nuclear weapons in North Korea.
According to the author, Washington should consider another approach.
It should inform North Korea that, unless it abandons its nuclear program, the United States will encourage South Korea and Japan to make their own decisions about also going nuclear.
That prospect might well cause the North to reconsider and keep the region nonnuclear.
Even if it does not do so, a nuclear balance of power in northeast Asia might emerge instead of a North Korean nuclear monopoly."
NORTH KOREA: OVERVIEW NTI
Source: NTI, updated Jan. 3, 2003 Non-USG Publication
NTI (Nuclear Threat Initiative), an organization founded by former Senator Sam Nunn and CNN founder Ted Turner, provides a clearinghouse for all types of material related to nuclear programs.
On this page there are links to many factual materials related to the specifics of North Koreas laboratories and missile facilities.
There are also valuable links to other materials on North Korea, the Agreed Framework and overviews of weapons programs of these countries: Argentina; Belarus; Brazil; China; Egypt; India; Iran; Iraq; Israel; Kazakhstan; Libya; Russia; South Africa; South Korea; Syria; Taiwan; Ukraine; Uzbekistán; Yugoslavia.
Balkans
---
Biotechnology/GMO's/Food Safety
2001-2002 LEGISLATIVE ACTIVITY RELATED TO AGRICULTURAL BIOTECHNOLOGY
Source: Pew Initiative on Food and Biotechnology, June 11, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This fact sheet is, in fact, a hypertexted goldmine of information on federal and state legislative activity on genetically modified organisms and other aspects of agricultural biotechnology.
It reveals that states continue to be active in addressing emerging issues raised by agricultural biotechnology.
During the 2001-2002 legislative session, 158 pieces of legislation related to agricultural biotechnology were introduced in 39 states.
Twenty-eight percent of introduced legislation addressed concerns about violent protest against agricultural biotechnology; eighteen percent of introduced legislation addressed rights and responsibilities of farmers and biotech seed producers by establishing liability for damages caused by misuse of genetically modified (GM) crops or by regulating agricultural contracts.
There is also a related Legislation Tracker database at: http://pewagbiotech.org/resources/factsheets/legislation, which is quite useful and easy to use.
Biotechnology in Animal Agriculture: An Overview
Source: Council for Agricultural Science and Technology, February 2003 Non-USG Publication
Written by a task force of nine scientists, this issue paper summarizes existing and emerging technologies and assesses their current and potential impacts.
The authors suggest that research on biotechnology in animal production is leading to breakthroughs on many fronts.
This paper is the first in a 9-part series on the topic "Animal Agriculture's Future through Biotechnology."
Among the issues this paper addresses are uses in human and veterinary medicine; uses in animal production; vaccine development; food safety; environmental impacts; and ethical considerations of animal biotechnology.
China/East Asia/Pacific
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page 2003 Annual Report on the Military Power of the People's Republic of China
Source: U.S. Dept of Defense, July 30, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Beijing is pursuing its long-term political goals of developing its comprehensive national power and ensuring a favorable strategic configuration of power.
Chinas efforts to accomplish its security goals involve an integrated strategy that seeks to apply diplomatic, informational, military, and economic instruments of national power.
Chinas leaders believe that national unity and stability are critical if China is to survive and develop as a nation.
Chinese leaders also believe they must maintain conditions of state sovereignty and territorial integrity.
While seeing opportunity and benefit in interactions with the United States -- primarily in terms of trade and technology -- Beijing apparently believes that the United States poses a significant long-term challenge.
Information Control and Self-Censorship in the PRC and the Spread of SARS
Source: CECC, May 7, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Congressional-Executive Commission on China (CECC) issued a report May 7 stating that Chinese government control of the means of publication and the lack of clear legal boundaries for free expression in China have inadvertently aided the spread of Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS) by impeding the free flow of information in the country.
more
Climate Change
DESIGNING A MANDATORY GREENHOUSE GAS REDUCTION PROGRAM FOR THE U.S. (zipped version)
Source: Pew Center on Global Climate Change, Robert R. Nordhaus and Kyle W. Danish, May 15, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This report examines options for designing a domestic greenhouse gas reduction program.
In addition to cap-and-trade programs, this report evaluates greenhouse gas taxes and a sectoral hybrid program that combines efficiency standards for automobiles and consumer products with a cap-and-trade program applicable to large sources of greenhouse gases.
Each option is evaluated according to the following criteria: environmental effectiveness, cost-effectiveness, administrative feasibility, distributional equity, and political acceptability.
The reports analysis suggests that the comprehensive, upstream cap-and-trade (or similar) approach and the sectoral hybrid approach are the most viable alternatives for a domestic program.
EMISSIONS TRADING IN THE U.S.: EXPERIENCE, LESSONS AND CONSIDERATIONS FOR GREENHOUSE GASES (zipped version)
Source: Pew Center on Global Climate Change, A. Denny Ellerman, Paul L. Joskow and David Harrison, Jr., May 15, 2003 Non-USG Publication
In recent years, emissions trading has become an important element of programs to control air pollution.
Experience indicates that an emissions trading program, if designed and implemented effectively, can achieve environmental goals faster and at lower costs than traditional command-and-control alternatives.
Under such a program, emissions are capped but sources have the flexibility to find and apply the lowest-cost methods for reducing pollution.
A cap-and-trade program is especially attractive for controlling global pollutants such as greenhouse gases because their warming effects are the same regardless of where they are emitted, the costs of reducing emissions vary widely by source, and the cap ensures that the environmental goal is attained.
Emissions trading has achieved prominence beyond the United States largely in the context of discussions regarding implementation of the Kyoto Protocol, a proposed international agreement to control emissions of carbon dioxide (CO2) and other greenhouse gases.
The Kyoto Protocol provides for the use of various emissions trading mechanisms at the international level.
Some countries already are developing emissions trading programs while the process of ratifying the Protocol moves forward.
Both the United Kingdom and Denmark have instituted greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions trading programs, and, in December 2002, the European environment ministers agreed on the ground rules for a European Union trading program that would begin in 2005 for large sources of CO2 emissions (and later for other GHG emissions).
Proposals to control GHG emissions in the United States also include the use of emissions trading.
Forests and Global Climate Change: Potential Impacts on U.S. Forest Resources
Source: Pew Center on Global Climate Change, Feb. 26, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The Pew Center report, Forests and Global Climate Change: Potential Impacts on U.S. Forest Resources, explores the challenges climate change will pose to forest ecosystems and related economic enterprises over the next century.
One-third of U.S. lands are covered by forests, making forest ecosystems one of the nations most prominent natural resources.
In addition to their contribution to biodiversity, water quality, and recreation, forests also play a significant role in the U.S. economy, and forestry or forestry-related enterprises are the dominant industries in many U.S. communities.
According to a new study by the Pew Center on Global Climate Change, the U.S. forestry sector will face a number of challenges in the next century due to the impacts of climate change.
Multi-Gas Contributors to Global Climate Change: Climate Impacts and Mitigation Costs of Non-CO2 Gases
Source: Pew Center on Global Climate Change, Feb. 11, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Multi-Gas Contributors to Global Climate Change: Climate Impacts and Mitigation Costs of Non-CO2 Gases discusses the sources and amounts of these emissions, the atmospheric interactions of the various gases, and the relative costs of reducing them.
Report authors John Reilly, Henry Jacoby, and Ronald Prinn of Massachusetts Institute of Technology use a general equilibrium modeling framework to analyze the costs and climate impacts of controlling various greenhouse gas emissions.
The report discusses opportunities and difficulties associated with incorporating non-CO2 greenhouse gases into a climate policy framework.
Planning Climate and Global Change Research: A Review of the Draft
Source: U.S. Climate Change Science Program Strategic Plan, National Research Council of the National Academies of Science and Engineering, Feb. 24, 2003 Non-USG Publication
A new study says that while the Bush administration's draft strategic plan for climate change research contains new initiatives, the plan lacks a guiding vision and does not sufficiently meet the needs of decision-makers who must deal with the effects of climate change.
A February 25 press release says the report, released by the National Research Council of the National Academies of Science and Engineering, also notes that the president's fiscal year 2004 budget appears to provide inadequate funding for the strategic plan, despite the new initiatives it calls for.
Climate Change 2001: Impacts, Adaptation and Vulnerability
Source: Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC), January 2003 Non-USG Publication
Two American professors -- one a biologist, one an economist -- have released findings linking global warming to changing life patterns among plants and animals in the natural environment.
Their report published in "Nature" January 2 documents how various species are apparently reacting to global warming by adjusting their range northward in search of cooler temperatures, or breeding earlier in the spring in response to warmer temperatures.
More
Death Penalty
---
Defense
Unclassified Report to Congress on the Acquisition of Technology Relating to Weapons of Mass Destruction and Advanced Conventional Munitions, 1 January Through 30 June 2002
Source: CIA, April 10, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Democracy/Human Rights/Religious Freedom
Cover of report on Supporting Human Rights and Democracy: The U.S. Record 2002-2003 Supporting Human Rights and Democracy: The U.S. Record 2002-2003
Source: Dept. of State, June 24, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The new State Department report "Supporting Human Rights and Democracy: The U.S. Record 2002-2003" captures the tireless work of the U.S. government to promote democratic structures and respect for human rights, says Secretary of State Colin Powell.
Powell wrote in the preface to the 193-page document, which was released to the U.S. Congress and the American public June 24, that it complements the annual "Country Reports on Human Rights Practices" in substance and spirit.
It also details, he said, "how we are applying the high standards of the Country Reports' to the actions we are taking to decrease the number and severity of human rights abuses worldwide."
A CATALOGUE OF FAILURES: G8 ARMS EXPORTS AND HUMAN RIGHTS VIOLATIONS
Source: Amnesty International, May 19, 2003 Non-USG Publication
At least two thirds of all global arms transfers in the years 1997-2001 came from five members of the G8.
The top supplier of weapons to the world was the United States, accounting for 28 per cent of global arms transfers.
Second in line was Russia, with seventeen per cent.
Third was France at 10 per cent, followed by Britain at 7 per cent and then Germany with 5 per cent.
For 25 years, US law has stipulated that weapons should be kept out of the hands of governments that will use them to abuse human rights.
Yet US commercial arms sales have frequently had the opposite effect.
US arms sales directed to developing countries have quadrupled from 2000 to 2001, many of them with forces that persistently abuse human rights.
In addition, US military aid is currently furnished to more than 30 countries identified by the US itself as having a "poor" human rights record, or worse.
Almost ten years ago, the USA, Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Russia and the United Kingdom (UK) signed up, with other participating states of the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe (OSCE), to the Principles Governing Conventional Arms Transfers.
These Principles commit participating states to "avoid transfers which would be likely to be used for the violation or suppression of human rights and fundamental freedoms."
However, an examination of the practices of these seven powerful states falls short of their agreed benchmark.
Trafficking in Persons report cover, June 2003, AP Photos Victims of Trafficking and Violence Protection Act of 2000: Trafficking in Persons Report
Source: U.S. Dept of State, June 11, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Secretary of State Colin Powell unveiled the third annual Trafficking in Persons Report June 11, saying that it demonstrates a heightened attention and concern about this "horrifying practice."
The U.S. report estimates that approximately 800,000-900,000 people are trafficked every year.
"Girls as young as five are sold into prostitution," Powell said at a Washington briefing upon the release of the congressionally mandated report.
more
The September 11 Detainees: A Review of the Treatment of Aliens Held on Immigration Charges in Connection with the Investigation of the September 11 Attacks
Source: U.S. Department of Justice, Office of the Inspector General, June 2, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Justice Department's Office of the Inspector General (OIG) issued a report June 2 saying it found "significant problems" in the treatment of aliens being held on immigration charges in connection with the investigation of the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks in the United States.
Pathbreaking Strategies in the Global Fight Against Sex Trafficking
Source: Department of State, May 29, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The U.S. Department of State has released a report calling on countries to marshal their resources to interdict and punish the perpetrators of sex trafficking and to protect and restore its victims.
The report, released May 29 in partnership with the non-governmental War on Trafficking Alliance, is the product of an international conference hosted by Secretary of State Colin Powell February 23-26, 2003.
The purpose of the conference, which drew participants from more than 100 countries and from all walks of life, was to find new ways to take action against the growing international crime of sex trafficking, which enslaves up to four million people each year.
Country Reports on Human Rights Practices
Source: U.S. Dept of State, March 31, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The annual human rights report --- titled "The Country Reports on Human Rights Practices for 2002" --- is a statement of the United States' fundamental belief that human rights are universal.
"They are indigenous to every corner of the world, in every culture and in every religious tradition," says the introduction to the country reports.
more | Chapter on Belgium
Advancing the Campaign Against Child Labor: Addressing the Worst Forms of Child Labor
Source: DOL, Jan. 13, 2003 USG: Official Publications
This report evaluates various strategies to eliminate the worst forms of child labor, such as bans on child labor, the rescue and rehabilitation of working children, and the provision of income support to the families of working children, and examines some of the issues that arise in the development of such strategies.
Development
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page HUMAN DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2003.
MILLENNIUM DEVELOPMENT GOALS: A COMPACT AMONG NATIONS TO END HUMAN POVERTY
Source: United Nations Development Programme, July 8, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Addressing poverty requires understanding its causes.
This Report adds to that understanding by analyzing the root causes of failed development.
During the 1990s debates about development focused on three sets of issues.
The first was the need for economic reforms to establish macroeconomic stability.
The second was the need for strong institutions and governanceto enforce the rule of law and control corruption.
The third was the need for social justice and involving people in decisions that affect them and their communities and countriesan issue that this Report continues to champion.
These issues are all crucial for sustainable human development, and they continue to deserve priority attention in policy-making.
But they overlook a fourth factor, explored here: the structural constraints that impede economic growth and human development.
The Millennium Development Compact presented in this Report proposes a policy approach to achieving the Millennium Development Goals that starts by addressing these constraints.
21st Century Agriculture: A Critical Role for Science and Technology
Source: USDA, June 23, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Scientific breakthroughs and technological developments in the 20th century have fueled substantial gains in agricultural productivity, the U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) says.
In a new report -- "21st Century Agriculture: A Critical Role for Science and Technology" -- released at the start of a U.S.-sponsored three-day conference in Sacramento, California, on agricultural science and technology, USDA adds that, with supportive policy, strong regulatory and institutional frameworks, and lower trade and other barriers, science and technology can further increase agricultural productivity and economic growth in both developed and developing countries.
WORKING OUT OF POVERTY
Source: International Labor Organization (ILO), June 6, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Among the nearly 3 billion people living on less than USD$2 a day, the report says some 1 billion - or about 23 per cent of the developing world's population - struggle along on USD$1 a day or less.
Regionally, poverty trends vary.
On the positive side, declining poverty in China and other East Asian countries in the 1990s significantly reduced the number of persons living on very low incomes, from 1.1 billion to about 900 million.
In South Asia, the number of people living in poverty remains more or less stable at about 1.1 billion, although population growth now makes this a smaller share of the population.
The situation elsewhere is another story, the report says.
Slow growth in sub-Saharan Africa in the 1990s elevated the number of people living in poverty by 25 per cent, to nearly 500 million.
During the same period, the number of people living in poverty in Latin America and the Caribbean increased from 121 million to 132 million, with a quarter of the population still subsisting on USD$2 a day or less.
In the Middle East and North Africa, the number of people living at or below that line rose from 50 million to nearly 70 million, while in Eastern Europe and Central Asia, the number increased three-fold to 97 million.
GREENING U.S. FOREIGN AID THROUGH THE MILLENNIUM CHALLENGE ACCOUNT
Source: Brookings Institution, Nigel Purvis, June 2003 Non-USG Publication
President Bushs Millennium Challenge Account (MCA) proposal is a tremendous opportunity to enhance U.S. development efforts, but it could harm the environment and undermine long-term economic growth unless managed correctly.
Congress should work with the administration to ensure that the MCA: * Promotes sustainable development, not economic growth alone; * Adopts extensive procedural safeguards to help it generate sound information about the environmental impact of its activities; * Makes the environment a priority area for grantmaking.
These steps would continue an important tradition of U.S. environmental leadership and make the MCA a more effective tool in the fight against global poverty.
Breaking the Conflict Trap: Civil War and Development Policy
Source: World Bank, May 14, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The international community should do more to prevent civil wars in poor countries, the World Bank says.
In a May 14 press release announcing a new study of such conflicts, the Bank said civil wars affect people around the world.
The costs of such wars include increased drug trafficking, infectious disease, and terrorism, plus neighboring countries experience the costs of dealing with refugees and stalled investment and economic growth, the release said.
more
Terrorism and Development: Using Social and Economic Development to Inhibit a Resurgence of Terrorism
Source: RAND, Kim Cragin, Peter Chalk, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Abstract: This report examines the social and economic development policies enacted by three countries--Israel, the Philippines, and the United Kingdom--to inhibit a resurgence of terrorism within their jurisdictions.
Drawing on a broad research base, including numerous first-hand interviews, the authors outline the initiatives implemented by each country then assess their effectiveness, with the aim of informing U.S. decisionmakers of the benefits and pitfalls of such initiatives as they develop policy to counter terrorism.
Among their conclusions are the following: Social and economic development policies can weaken local support for terrorist activities and discourage terrorist recruits, and such policies can be used as a "stick" to discourage terrorism.
They caution, however, that the ability of these policies to inhibit terrorism depends on their implementation, and inadequately funded such policies are likely to renew support for terrorism.
Global Development Finance 2003 - Striving for Stability in Development Finance
Source: World Bank, April 2, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Since the late 1990s, a fundamental shift has occurred in the pattern of private sector financial flows to developing countries.
Debt flows have fallen sharply, while equity flowsmainly in the form of foreign direct investmenthave remained comparatively robust.
This shift from debt to equity should diminish the volatility of developing countries external finance and improve their access to technology, markets, and management expertise.
But much more needs to be done to put development finance on a stable basis.The decline in debt flows, coupled with weak export revenues, has placed enormous pressure on the middle-income, highly indebted countries.
Many low-income countries face the triple burden of low commodity prices, unsustainable debt, and declining levels of aid.
Growth remains well short of what is necessary to achieve the Millennium Development Goals.
E-COMMERCE AND DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2002
Source: United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD), February 2003 Non-USG Publication
In contrast with the weak performance of several key developed and developing economies in recent months and the difficulties experienced by the information technology (IT) sector, Internet use and particularly electronic commerce have continued to grow at a fast pace since the publication of the E-Commerce and Development Report 2001.
The number of Internet users worldwide is expected to reach 655 million by the end of 2002.
Developing countries accounted for almost one third of new Internet users worldwide in 2001.
In most of them, however, Internet penetration rates remain very low.
As for e-commerce, the report presents three estimates of global online sales.
In the most optimistic forecast, e-commerce would represent about 18 per cent of worldwide business-to-business and retail transactions in 2006.
The effects of Internet-induced changes in the global economy and their implications for developing countries will depend to a significant extent on factors that policy-makers, business players and other stakeholders can influence.
Policies must be designed, articulated in coherent e-strategies and implemented in partnership with all the relevant players to ensure that the new opportunities for creating, transforming, applying and exchange information and value are used to improve the productivity of developing economies and their enterprises.
Foreign Aid in the National Interest: Promoting Freedom, Security, and Opportunity
Source: USAID, Jan. 7, 2003 USG: Official Publications
U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) Administrator Andrew Natsios says support for international development has become "one of the three essential components of American foreign policy" alongside defense and diplomacy.
Drugs
International Narcotics Control Strategy Report (INCSR) of 2002
Source: U.S. State Department, March 1, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The U.S. campaign against global terrorism in 2002 highlighted the importance of international drug control programs, says the International Narcotics Control Strategy Report (INCSR) of 2002 issued by the U.S. State Department March 1.
more
Economy and Trade
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page HOW TO BUILD A BETTER TRADE PACT WITH CENTRAL AMERICA
Source: Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Sandra Polaski, July 2003 Non-USG Publication
The CAFTA negotiations represent a potential turning point for Central America.
The region is economically fragile and politically precarious.
A well-constructed CAFTA could reinforce weak institutions and government capacities and thus allow positive market forces to take hold, creating jobs and gradually allowing the region to grow out of poverty.
But the large size of the agricultural sector, the severe constraints on workers and households, the lack of public funds for adjustment, as well as the deficient laws and weak enforcement systems all demand that CAFTA be constructed with extraordinary care.
Otherwise, the positive opportunity could instead produce a major development setback.
To achieve progress and avoid peril, the United States will have to make proposals and take steps it has never undertaken.
U.S. negotiators have long recognized that a cookie-cutter approach to trade pacts does not produce good results.
CAFTA will be the most demanding test of their ability to break new ground.
RECIPROCITY IN FREE TRADE AGREEMENTS
Source: World Bank, Caroline Freund, May 20, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The results of this data analysis offer strong evidence of reciprocity in North-North and South-South free trade agreements, but there is little empirical support for reciprocity in North-South trade agreements.
In particular, after controlling for other determinants of trade preferences, the results suggest that a one percent increase in preferences offered leads to about a one-half of a percent increase in preferences received in North-North and South-South trade agreements.
Freund also finds evidence that large countries extract greater trade concessions from small countries.
This leads to a modified form of reciprocity in North-South agreements.
ADJUSTING TO TRADE LIBERALIZATION - THE ROLE OF POLICY, INSTITUTIONS AND WTO DISCIPLINES
Source: World Trade Organization, Marc Bacchetta and Marion Jansen, Web-posted May 23, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This study seeks to identify tools at the disposal of governments to smooth adjustment to liberalized trade regimes, to minimize an economy's adjustment costs and to alleviate the burden of those who suffer most.
Some of the salient conclusions from the study are: Trade liberalization is an agent of economic change, but evidence shows that it does not lead to drastic changes in a country's overall production structure; Adjustment costs are typically smaller, sometimes much smaller, than the gains from trade; Governments can identify individuals and groups that may suffer from the adjustment process and they can also develop policies to alleviate the burden falling on those adversely affected; Governments can adopt policies that influence the size of adjustment costs faced by the economy; Adjustment costs can be reduced if trade policy reforms are underpinned by international commitments; The pace of trade reforms can have a beneficial impact on adjustment costs; The implementation of trade reforms can have a beneficial impact on adjustment costs; The implementation of trade reforms at a gradual pace may lessen political opposition to change, but the risk of undermining reforms by adopting them too slowly must also be borne in mind; In many cases effective adjustment to trade liberalization will require the expansion of a country's export sector and this may be an argument for pro-export policies; WTO agreements seek to provide space for governments to tackle adjustment problems.
ECONOMIC IMPACTS OF CHINAS ACCESSION TO THE WORLD TRADE ORGANIZATION
Source: World Bank, World Bank Policy Research Working Paper 3053, Elena Ianchovichina and William Martin, May 2003 Non-USG Publication
This paper presents estimates of the impact of accession by China and Chinese Taipei to the WTO.
China is estimated to be the biggest beneficiary, followed by Chinese Taipei and their major trading partners.
Accession will boost the labor-intensive manufacturing sectors in China and especially the textiles and apparel sector that will benefit directly from the removal of quotas on textiles and apparel exports to North America and Western Europe.
Consequently, developing economies competing with China in third markets may suffer relatively small losses.
China has already benefited from the reforms undertaken between 1995 and 2001 (US$31 billion) and trade reforms after accession will lead to additional gains of around $US10 billion.
Accession will have important distributional consequences for China, with wages of skilled workers and unskilled non-farm workers rising in real terms and relative to farm incomes.
Reduction in agricultural protection may hurt some farmers.
RESTORING G-8 LEADERSHIP OF THE WORLD ECONOMY: RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE EVIAN SUMMIT FROM THE SHADOW G-8
Source: Institute for International Economics, May 2003 Non-USG Publication
The sharp disruption of relations among leading G-8 countries, due to the Iraq war and elements of the postwar planning, dramatically emphasizes the need for a successful G-8 summit at Evian in early June.
The summit in France will be the first meeting of Heads of State and Government, including those who have clashed sharply over the war, since its conclusion.
It is imperative that these leaders convincingly demonstrate their desire to achieve prompt reconciliation among their nations and to resist any temptations toward recrimination.
They can do so only by launching new initiatives that demonstrate both their will and their capacity to cooperate effectively.
U.S.- EUROPEAN UNION TRADE RELATIONS: ISSUES AND POLICY CHALLENGES
Source: CRS Report for Congress.
Raymond J. Ahearn, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated May 12, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The United States and European Union have a full plate of high profile bilateral disputes this year.
Several of the disputes may need to be resolved and new potential disputes avoided if the bilateral trade strains are to be contained and a smoother trade relationship is to develop.
Moreover, progress on the bilateral front could provide a foundation for the two trading giants to make progress in efforts to begin the process of multilateral trade negotiations as prescribed by the Doha Ministerial Declaration.
Resolution of disputes over steel, the U.S. export tax subsidy, and the EU ban on imports of genetically modified organisms (GMOs) are at the top of the list of bilateral challenges.
Looking Behind the Curtain: The Growth of Trade Barriers that Ignore Sound Science
Source: NFTC, May 2003 Non-USG Publication
Burdensome national standards and technical regulations imposed by the European Union (EU) and other major U.S. trading partners are trade barriers that often ignore sound science, according to a new report by a leading U.S. trade association.
more
USTR 2003 Special 301 report
Source: USTR, May 1, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The annual U.S. review of global intellectual property rights (IPR) protection has again cited Ukraine for its "persistent failure" to protect "optical media" products such as CDs, DVDs, and CD-ROMs, the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative (USTR) says.
The USTR review, known as the "Special 301" report on global intellectual property protection, also indicated that Armenia, Greece, New Zealand and Qatar had shown sufficient improvement over the past year to qualify for removal from the "watch list" for IPR violations.
WORLD ECONOMIC OUTLOOK: GROWTH AND INSTITUTIONS
Source: International Monetary Fund, April 2003 Non-USG Publication
For the past three months, concerns over conflict in the Middle East have weighed heavily on the global economy, through oil prices, through confidence effects and through financial markets.
As near-term uncertainties over the conflict recede, the question of the hour is whether present sputtering global growth will suddenly lunge ahead into an immediate strong recovery.
Perhaps, but our baseline here is for subnormal growth of 3.2 percent (1.1 trillion dollars) in 2003, rising to 4.1 percent in 2004.
This baseline assumes a tepid global recovery with normal growth only resuming sometime during the first half of 2004.
Across the major regions, the United States, which accounts for just over 1/5 of global GDP, is projected to have 2.2 percent growth in 2003 -- not yet enough to make a meaningful dent in unemployment -- and 3.6 percent growth in 2004.
Growth in the euro area (roughly 1/6th of global GDP) is again lackluster at 1.1 percent in 2003 and 2.3 percent in 2004.
Japan remains mired in a slump at 0.8 percent growth for 2003 and 1.0 percent for 2004.
Emerging Asia is in fact the strongest growing region of the world at 6.0 percent for 2003 and 6.3 percent for 2004, though we do not view this recovery as self-sustaining if the rest of the world slumps.
Moreover, the effects of the incipient SARS epidemic are likely to have an adverse impact (of perhaps about 0.4 percent if the epidemic lasts for one quarter).
The report has four main chapters, separately accessible:
· Economic Prospects and Policy Issues, with analyses of major regions, plus tables of output projections · When Bubbles Burst, which has two essays on the macroeconomic and financial aftereffects of the bursting of an asset price bubble · Growth and Institutions, including issues of history, geography, development levels and governance · Unemployment and Labor Market Institutions: Why Reforms Pay Off, examining differences between structural and transitional unemployment and some data on OECD and Euro zone nations
USTR 2003 Review of Telecom Trade Agreements Highlights Market Access Barriers around the World · pdf
Source: USTR, April 2, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Furthering its mission to promote market access in telecommunications markets abroad, the Office of the United States Trade Representative (USTR) announced the results of the 2003 annual review of foreign compliance with telecommunications trade agreements (the "Section 1377" review).
The key issues identified this year include continued problems with high wholesale prices for access to foreign telecom networks and foreign regulators that lack the will or ability to address these and other problems.
Countries such as the United Kingdom, Italy and Germany have made important progress in addressing these issues over the past year.
Others, such as Mexico and Japan, are beginning to develop possible solutions.
U.S.-Japan Economic Ties: Status and Outlook
Source: CRS Report for Congress, William H. Cooper, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated March 13, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The U.S.-Japan relationship is a longterm one involving mutually accepted principles regional economic and political stability; market-driven economies; and democratic systems of government.
The relationship is also complex, encompassing many factors.
The United States and Japan are closely tied economically and the United States ranks as Japans number one export market and import supplier.
The two economies are also tied by financial capital flows.
The United States and Japan work together in multilateral fora, such as the World Trade Organization (WTO) and the Asian-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) forum, a fledgling regional organization.
A WTO dispute panel formed to hear the complaint brought by Japan, the EU, Brazil, China, New Zealand, Norway, South Korea, and Switzerland against the U.S. decision to impose section 201 (safeguard) actions against steel imports is scheduled to issue its decision by March 21, 2003.
WTO members are struggling to meet a March 31 deadline to have in place the modalities within which negotiations in a number of areas including, agriculture and services, are to take place in the Doha Development Agenda (DDA) round of negotiations.
While Japan and the United States are in agreement in most areas, they have taken diametrically opposing positions on agriculture Agriculture has proved a major stumbling block in the DDA negotiations.
2003 TRADE POLICY AGENDA AND 2002 ANNUAL REPORT
Source: Office of the United States Trade Representative (USTR), March 3, 2003 USG: Official Publications
A key achievement this past year was the renewal of the Executive-Congressional partnership embodied in Trade Promotion Authority (TPA).
With that authority restored after a lapse of eight years, the Administration has begun to fulfill the vision of open markets and development articulated at the launch of new global trade negotiations in Doha, Qatar, in 2001.
The United States has submitted far-reaching proposals to the World Trade Organization (WTO), including plans to remove all tariffs on manufactured goods, open agriculture and services markets, and address the special needs of poorer developing countries.
Working closely with the Congress, the Administration capped the year by completing Free Trade Agreement (FTA) negotiations with Chile and Singapore, which, when implemented, will open new markets for American exporters while expanding choice and value for American consumers.
By lowering prices through imports and increasing incomes through trade, Americas newest trade agreements will build on the success of the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) and the Uruguay Round.
The Bush Administration looks forward to continuing to work with the Congress in 2003 to lay a firm foundation for a more prosperous America by passing the free trade agreements with Chile and Singapore; building upon administration proposals to open markets in global trade talks; advancing negotiations on the Free Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA); negotiating new FTAs with the five countries of the Central American Common Market, Australia, Morocco, and the five countries of the Southern African Customs Union; enforcing U.S. trade laws; and monitoring and pressing Chinas and Taiwans compliance with their WTO obligations.
Economic Report of the President
Source: The White House, February 2003 USG: Official Publications
Securing economic freedom, governing justly and investing in people are key principles for promoting world economic growth, the White House says in a recent report.
"The economy is recovering from the effects of the slowdown that began in the middle of 2000 and led to the subsequent recession.
The American economy has been hit hard by the events of the past three years, most tragically by the effects of the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001.
Our economy and investor confidence were hurt when we learned that some corporate leaders were not playing by the rules.
The combined impact of these events, along with the three-year decline in stock values that impacted business investment, slowed growth in 2002.
Despite these challenges, the economys underlying fundamentals remain solidincluding low inflation, low interest rates, and strong productivity gains.
Yet the pace of the expansion has not been satisfactory; there are still too many Americans looking for jobs.
We will not be satisfied until every part of our economy is vigorous and every person who wants a job can find one."
U.S.- European Union Trade Relations: Issues and Policy Challenges
Source: CRS Report for Congress.
Raymond J. Ahearn, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Jan. 27, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The United States and European Union have a full plate of high profile bilateral disputes this year.
Several of the disputes may need to be resolved and new potential disputes avoided if the bilateral trade strains are to be contained and a smoother trade relationship is to develop.
Moreover, progress on the bilateral front could provide a foundation for the two trading giants to make progress in efforts to begin the process of multilateral trade negotiations as prescribed by the Doha Ministerial Declaration.
Resolution of disputes over steel, the U.S. export tax subsidy, and the EU ban on imports of genetically modified organisms (GMOs) are at the top of the list of bilateral challenges.
In response to the Bush Administrations March 5, 2002 decision to impose temporary tariffs of up to 30% on approximately $8 billion in steel imports, the EU threatened to counter with retaliatory tariffs on U.S. exports throughout the spring and summer of this year.
But subsequent decisions by the Bush Administration to exempt about 50% of European steel from the tariffs helped persuade the EU not to retaliate against the United States without authorization from the WTO.
Similarly, both sides are working to avoid implementation of a August 30, 2002 WTO ruling that authorizes $4 billion in EU retaliation in the dispute over the U.S. export tax subsidy.
And the Bush Administration is under increased pressure from several farm organizations to request the creation of a special WTO panel to adjudicate the dispute involving the EUs ban on imports of food products containing GMOs.
Education
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page THE CONDITION OF EDUCATION 2003
Source: United States Department of Education, National Center for Education Statistics, June 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Condition of Education summarizes important developments and trends in education using the latest available data.
The report, which is required by law, is an indicator report intended for a general audience of readers who are interested in education.
The indicators represent a consensus of professional judgment on the most significant national measures of the condition and progress of education for which accurate data are available.
The 2003 print edition includes 44 indicators in six main areas: (1) enrollment trends and student characteristics at all levels of the education system from elementary education to adult learning; (2) student achievement and the longer term, enduring effects of education; (3) student effort and rates of progress through the educational system among different population groups; (4) the contexts of elementary and secondary education in terms of courses taken, teacher characteristics, and other factors; (5) the contexts of postsecondary education; and (6) societal support for learning, including parental and community support for learning, and public and private financial support of education at all levels.
T his edition also includes a special analysis on the reading achievement and classroom experiences of kindergarteners and 1st graders.
E-Government
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page BENCHMARKING E-GOVERNMENT IN EUROPE AND THE US
Source: Rand, Irma Graafland-Essers, Emile Ettedgui, July 9, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This study addresses the demand-side of e-government--not only usage--but also perceptions and barriers to utilization that have not been treated previously.
Indicators to measure acceptance and adoption of e-government were used to build two surveys that were then piloted among members of the 'general population' in the 15 EU Member States, Switzerland and the USA, and to IT managers in the commercial sector in seven EU countries.
The survey shows that only about one third of businesses are currently using e-government.
Among these, only about one third prefer this method over existing methods.
THE RISE OF NETPOLITIK: HOW THE INTERNET IS CHANGING INTERNATIONAL POLITICS AND DIPLOMACY
Source: The Aspen Institute, David Bollier, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Diasporic communities around the world affect the internal politics and external policy positions of their homelands through e-mails and websites.
The rapid transmission of news directly from the source allows world players to bypass formal diplomatic channels, requires quicker and perhaps less considered responses by government officials, and enables NGOs to express and impress their positions more widely.
Cybercampaigns influence political and economic decisions throughout the world.
Most recently and ironically, critics have used global communications networks to organize protests against globalization around the world.
Terrorist organizations have used the Internet to recruit and inform their cell members.
Information input in England to a website registered in China helped a terrorist network topple the World Trade Center in New York.
These collected papers form an import basis for discussions of the future of international diplomacy in an increasingly connected world.
Election Reform
---
Environment/Energy
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page FRESHWATER SUPPLY: STATES' VIEW OF HOW FEDERAL AGENCIES COULD HELP THEM MEET THE CHALLENGES OF EXPECTED SHORTAGES
Source: United States General Accounting Office (GAO), July 10, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The last comprehensive national water availability and use assessment, completed 25 years ago, identified critical problems, such as shortages and conflicts among users.
Future water availability and use is difficult to predict.
For example, while USDAs 1999 forecast of future water usenot availabilityprojects a rise in total withdrawals of only 7 percent by 2040, it also warns of the tenuous nature of such projections.
If the most important and uncertain assumptions used in USDAs projection, such as a decrease in irrigated acreage, fail to materialize, water use may be substantially above the estimate.
Current trends indicate that demands on the nations water resources are growing.
While the nations capacity for storing surface-water is limited and ground-water is being depleted, demands for freshwater are growing as the population increases, and pressures increase to keep water instream for fisheries, wildlife habitat, recreation, and scenic enjoyment.
For example, ground-water supplies have been significantly depleted in many parts of the country, most notably in the High Plains aquifer underlying eight western states, which in some areas now holds less than half of the water held prior to commencement of ground-water pumping.
Meanwhile, according to Bureau of the Census projections, the southwestern states of California, New Mexico, Arizona, and Nevada, states that are already taxing their current water supplies, are each expected to see their population increase by more than 50 percent from 1995 to 2025.
Furthermore, the potential effects of climate change create additional uncertainty about future water availability and use.
For example, less snow pack as a result of climate change could harm states that rely extensively on melted snow runoff for their freshwater supply.
State water managers expect freshwater shortages in the near future, and their consequences could be severe.
According to the results of GAOs survey, even under normal water conditions, water managers in 36 states anticipate water shortages in localities, regions, or statewide within the next 10 years.
Under drought conditions, 46 managers expect shortages in the next 10 years.
Such shortages may be accompanied by severe economic, environmental, and social impacts.
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page U.S. ENERGY SCENARIOS FOR THE 21ST CENTURY
Source: Pew Center on Global Climate Change, Irving Mintzer, J. Amber Leonard, Peter Schwartz, July 10, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The question of how U.S. energy supply and use which account for over 80 percent of U.S. greenhouse gas emissions will evolve over the next several decades is critical to developing sound U.S. climate policy.
To answer this question, the Pew Center convened two workshops with members of its Business Environmental Leadership Council and experts from the academic and NGO sectors to envision possible future energy scenarios and to draw policy-relevant conclusions from them.
This report includes discussion of these three scenarios, as well as assessments of key energy technologies for the future.
Three significant insights emerged: * Without a mandatory carbon constraint, the absolute level of U.S. emissions rises in the range of 15 to 50 percent over the year 2000 level in each of the Pew Center scenarios, despite the fact that the carbon intensity of the economy declines considerably.
This result points to a key conclusion of this report - policy is necessary to stem these increases and to address climate change; * A second conclusion of the report is that no matter which direction the future takes there are technologieswith supporting policies and investmentsthat could address climate change, accelerate capital stock turnover, and enhance energy security.
If U.S. decision-makers can implement the necessary policies and encourage appropriate investments during the next thirty years, the United States would be better positioned to achieve multiple public policy goals.
* Finally, the scenarios indicate that energy policy and investment decisions made today affect the difficulty of implementing a climate policy tomorrow.
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page MEASURING UP: NEW DIRECTIONS FOR ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAMS AT THE WORLD BANK
Source: World Bank Policy Research Working Paper 3097, Piet Buys, Susmita Dasgupta, Craig Meisner, Kiran Pandey, David Wheeler, Katharine Bolt, Kirk Hamilton, Limin Wang, July 8, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The World Bank's new Environment Strategy focuses on environmental programs that will improve the well-being of poor people in developing countries.
The strategy advocates cost-effective reduction of air and water pollutants that are most harmful to human health.
In addition, it addresses threats to the livelihood of over one billion people who live on fragile lands (i.e., lands that are steeply sloped, arid, or covered by natural forests).
The new approach will require accurate information about environmental threats to health and livelihood, as well as an appropriate resource-allocation strategy.
Drawing on recent research at the World Bank and elsewhere, this paper attempts to contribute in three ways.
First, the authors develop a rule for optimal cross-country resource allocation that reflects the Bank's investment policy.
Using this rule, they estimate optimal country shares of Bank environmental investments from two sets of variables: threats from outdoor air pollution, water pollution and fragile lands; and estimates of the likelihood that Bank projects will succeed.
They combine the country shares with Bank investment data to estimate optimal country allocations.
Finally, we aggregate our country results to allocations for the major regions in which the Bank operates.
The authors find that the largest share of total optimal investment goes to East Asia (44%), followed by South Asia (21%) and Sub-Saharan Africa (19%).
Other regions get significantly lower shares (respectively 6%, 5% and 5% for Latin America and the Caribbean, Eastern Europe and Central Asia, and North Africa and the Middle East).
Within sectors, optimal investment patterns vary significantly.
Sub-Saharan Africa gets a large allocation for safe water (34%), exceeded only by East Asia (38%), while South Asia gets 15%.
Africa's allocation for cleaner air is strikingly lower (6%), in the same range as the lowest-investment regions, while East Asia (largely China) commands 50% and South Asia 24%.
The allocation for natural resource management is close to the overall allocation, with East Asia receiving 44%, South Asia 24%, Sub-Saharan Africa 15%, and the other regions much lower shares.
DRAFT REPORT ON THE ENVIRONMENT
Source: EPA, June 23, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) released a comprehensive report June 23 providing the first nation-wide picture of environmental conditions of air, water and land.
The report finds that significant progress in cleaning up pollution has been achieved in recent decades but more needs to be done, according to an EPA press release.
Air is cleaner, water is purer, and waste is better managed, the report concludes.
Still, more than 130 million Americans live in areas that experience unhealthful air at some times.
In releasing the report, EPA Administrator Christie Whitman said the report "begins an important national dialogue on how we can improve our ability to assess the nation's environmental quality and human health, and how we can use that knowledge to make improvements."
GREENING U.S. FOREIGN AID THROUGH THE MILLENNIUM CHALLENGE ACCOUNT
Source: Brookings Institution, Nigel Purvis, June 2003 Non-USG Publication
President Bushs Millennium Challenge Account (MCA) proposal is a tremendous opportunity to enhance U.S. development efforts, but it could harm the environment and undermine long-term economic growth unless managed correctly.
Congress should work with the administration to ensure that the MCA: * Promotes sustainable development, not economic growth alone; * Adopts extensive procedural safeguards to help it generate sound information about the environmental impact of its activities; * Makes the environment a priority area for grantmaking.
These steps would continue an important tradition of U.S. environmental leadership and make the MCA a more effective tool in the fight against global poverty.
International Energy Outlook 2003
Source: EIA, May 1, 2003 USG: Official Publications
A significant increase in global energy consumption through 2025 is expected to be driven mostly by the emerging economies of Asia, with natural gas as the fastest growing component of the energy mix, the U.S. Energy Department says.
The Atlas of International Freshwater Agreements · pdf format
Source: United Nations Environment Programme, March 20, 2003 Non-USG Publication
A new study says that 158 international river basins upon which millions of people depend for drinking water, irrigation, fisheries and hydropower could be flashpoints for future disputes and that cooperation between countries covering these basins is inconsistent or absent.
A March 22 press release says the study, entitled "The Atlas of International Freshwater Agreements," reports that many of these river basins are in Asia, Latin America and Africa where tensions over water may be aggravated by rising populations and existing political, social and environmental upheavals.
The atlas, based on maps, statistical analyses and historical documents, was published by the U.N. Environment Program (UNEP) in conjunction with the U.N. Food and Agricultural Organization and Oregon State University to mark World Water Day on March 22.
Loss of forest cover threatens freshwater supplies
Source: FAO, March 4, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The loss of forest cover and conversion to other land uses can adversely affect freshwater supplies, threatening the survival of millions of people and damaging the environment, according to FAO.
The study on forests and water stresses the need for sustainable management of mountain forests and upland areas.
The study emphasizes that mountainous forested watersheds are the most important freshwater-yielding areas in the world, "but also the source areas for landslides, torrents and floods."
Unlocking the water potential of agriculture
Source: FAO, March 12, 2003 Non-USG Publication
A new study by the U.N. Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO) says farmers in developing countries will face increasing competition for scare freshwater resources from industry and domestic users, and will need to produce more crops per liter of water and conserve precious water resources.
Water for People, Water for Life.
World Water Assessment Report
Source: The United Nations World Water Development Report, March 4, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The world water crisis will reach unprecedented levels in the years ahead as resources steadily decline because of population growth, pollution and expected climate change, and also because of political inertia, according to a major study released by the United Nations.
A March 5 press release says the 600-page World Water Development Report -- more than two years in the making and based on contributions from 23 U.N. agencies and commissions -- is the most comprehensive overview of the planet's most essential natural resource.
It is being released prior to the start of the Third World Water Forum to be held March 16-23 in Kyoto, Japan.
The report, released by the U.N. Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization (UNESCO), takes an in-depth look at every major dimension of water use and management -- from the growth of cities to the threat of looming water wars between countries.
It charges that the water crisis "is a crisis of governance and a lack of political will to manage the resource wisely."
Europe/Russia/NIS
Communicating Europe
Source: Foreign Policy Center, Next Generation Democracy Series, British Council 
Democracy relies on communication between citizens and those in power.
However, at the European level, too often the strategy is to focus on sending out pro-European messages, rather than presenting the EU as a political system with room for disagreement, discussion and debate.
Unless the Convention takes account of how the newly constitutionalised EU links to its citizens via the media, it will produce solutions that fail to engage its stakeholders, and will reinforce the 'democratic deficit'.
Based on a unique study of the broadcast media across the EU, de Vreese defines how the media actually covers European issues, and lays out some concrete recommendations about how the EU must change.
The EU must redesign its communication strategies to take account of the methods broadcast journalists actually use to produce European stories; to use all the advantages the EU has to give the institutions a 'human face'; and to develop strong links between the European level of policymaking and the national media marketplaces.
Foreign Policy
This logo indicates that a new item has been added to the page The Al-Jazeera News Network: Opportunity or Challenge for U.S. Foreign Policy in the Middle East?
Source: U.S. Congressional Research Service, Jeremy M. Sharp Middle East Policy Analyst Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, Updated July 23, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Al-Jazeera, the Arab worlds first all-news network was started by the Persian Gulf monarchy of Qatar.
It has come to be recognized as a key player in covering issues of central importance to U.S. foreign policy in the Middle East: the conflict in Iraq, the war on terrorism, and the Israeli-Palestinian conflict.
Al-Jazeera has become so publicly influential that U.S. officials now regularly appear on the network.
Although Al-Jazeera has received praise for its uncensored format and for airing interviews with U.S. and Israeli officials, as well as Arab critics of the policies of Arab governments, it has drawn criticism from many observers in the United States and elsewhere for a perceived lack of objectivity in covering these conflicts, including the activities of Al Qaeda.
For their part, officials from Al-Jazeera have claimed that theymerely reflect Arab popular resentment of U.S. policy in the Middle East.
Views of a Changing World 2003 -- War With Iraq Further Divides Global Publics
Source: Pew Research Center for the People and the Press, June 3, 2003 Non-USG Publication
"The speed of the war in Iraq and the prevailing belief that the Iraqi people are better off as a result have modestly improved the image of America.
But in most countries, opinions of the U.S. are markedly lower than they were a year ago.
The war has widened the rift between Americans and Western Europeans, further inflamed the Muslim world, softened support for the war on terrorism, and significantly weakened global public support for the pillars of the post-World War II era the U.N. and the North Atlantic alliance."
Axis of Instability: Britain, America and the New World Order after Iraq
Source: Foreign Policy Center, The Bow Group, World Order After Iraq Series, Andrew Tyrie MP, March 2003 Non-USG Publication
Will Iraq mark the emergence of a US dominated new world order, or a step on the road to international anarchy? Andrew Tyrie provides a thoughtful, searching and powerful essay on Western foreign policy and the post-11 September re-ordering of the world.
The conservative position that he stakes out - that both the Bush and Blair foreign policy doctrines will not enhance but imperil our security, whatever the outcome of the crisis - is a persuasive one.
The Foreign Policy Centre and the Bow Group are both delighted to open up these arguments for debate.
LESSONS FROM THE PAST: THE AMERICAN RECORD IN NATION-BUILDING
Source: Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Minxin Pei and Sara Kasper, April 11, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The record shows that democratic nation-building is among the most ambitious and difficult of foreign policy undertakings for the United States.
Of the 16 over the past century, democracy was sustained in only 4 countries ten years after the departure of American forces.
Two of these followed total defeat and surrender (in World War II) and two were in tiny countries (Grenada and Panama).
The record also reveals that unilateral nation-building by the United States has an even lower success rate perhaps because unilateralism has led to the creation of surrogate regimes and direct American administration during the interim post-conflict period.
The use of interim surrogate regimes has produced a record of complete failure.
No American-supported surrogate regime made the transition to democracy and only one case of direct American administration (in Japan) succeeded in ushering in democracy.
To heed the lessons of experience, the Bush administration should support a multilateral reconstruction strategy centered on bolstering political legitimacy and economic burden-sharing under the auspices of the United Nations.
WHAT DOES INTERNATIONAL LAW SAY ABOUT PRISONERS OF WAR?
Source: Council on Foreign Relations, updated March 26, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Brief overview of international law regarding prisoners of war, including links to major international conventions.
Play to Win: Report of the Commission on Post-Conflict Reconstruction
Source: CSIS, February 2003 Non-USG Publication
The final report of the bipartisan Commission on Post-Conflict Reconstruction, "Play to Win," sets forth 17 recommendations the U.S. government must follow in order to improve its ability to rebuild countries and societies following armed conflict.
The Commission, convened by CSIS and the Association of the U.S. Army, consists of 27 distinguished members with extensive experience in the U.S. Congress, military, various executive branch agencies, and international and non-governmental organizations.
AGENDA 2003: SHAPING AMERICA'S FUTURE
Source: Heritage Foundation, Janvier 2003
Heritage, a conservative think tank, outlines its agenda and policy recommendations for the coming year.
Agenda 2003 contains 28 concise chapters with 124 separate recommendations.
After approximately 20 pages of summary and introductory material, the report is split roughly evenly between domestic policy and foreign policy.
Foreign Aid in the National Interest: Promoting Freedom, Security, and Opportunity
Source: USAID, Jan. 7, 2003 USG: Official Publications
U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) Administrator Andrew Natsios said support for international development has become "one of the three essential components of American foreign policy" alongside defense and diplomacy.
Global Issues
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page A Chartbook of International Labor Comparisons: United States, Europe, and Asia
Source: U.S. Department of Labor, Elaine L. Chao, Secretary, May 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Labor Department has issued A Chartbook of International Labor Comparisons: United States, Europe, and Asia.
The book, a collaborative effort the Bureau of Labor Statistics and the Bureau of International Labor Affairs, is the department's first international chartbook to compare select Asian-Pacific countries with both the U.S. and Europe.
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page Columbia Accident Investigation Board Report
Source: The Columbia Accident Investigation Board, August 26, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The Columbia Accident Investigation Board has determined that physical and organizational causes played equal roles in the loss of the space shuttle Columbia and seven astronauts on February 1.
The 13-member board, which on August 26 released its 248-page final report on the causes of the shuttle accident, also concluded that while the present space shuttle system of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) is not "inherently unsafe," a number of mechanical fixes are required to make the shuttle safer in the short-term.
GLOBALIZATIONS SECURITY IMPLICATIONS
Source: RAND, Lynn E. Davis., March 2003 Non-USG Publication
Globalization can promote prosperity, eradicate disease, and advance political freedom.
It can also promote transnational threats, including weapons of mass destruction.
This paper raises the broader issues arising from different aspects of globalization, focusing both on the threats and the opportunities, with the goal of suggesting very briefly a new way of approaching security in the coming decades.
Just as important, the paper tries to make the case that the national security and international economic policymaking communities each has a critical stake in what traditionally have been the responsibilities of the other.
MICROBIAL THREATS TO HEALTH: EMERGENCE, DETECTION, AND RESPONSE
Source: Institute of Medicine, March 2003 Non-USG Publication
The U.S. government should be doing more to prepare for outbreaks of infectious diseases, both domestically and internationally, according to a report issued March 18 by the Institute of Medicine (IOM).
The report's list of recommendations call for upgrades in laboratory facilities, training programs, research, vaccine development and international cooperation.
Global Employment Trends
Source: International Labor Organization (ILO), Jan. 24, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Worldwide unemployment has climbed to new heights after two years of economic slowdown, according to a report issued January 24 by the U.N. International Labor Organization (ILO).
A news release announcing the "Global Employment Trends" report said the ILO estimates that the number of unemployed persons increased 20 million since 2000 to 180 million at the end of 2002.
Health
REPORT OF THE JOINT WHO/FAO EXPERT CONSULTATION ON DIET, NUTRITION AND THE PREVENTION OF CHRONIC DISEASES
Source: World Health Organization (WHO) and the Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO), Web-posted March 2003 Non-USG Publication
The WHO/FAO Expert Consultation on Diet, Nutrition and the Prevention of Chronic Diseases met in Geneva from 28 January to 1 February 2002 to examine the science base of the relationship between diet and physical activity patterns, and the major nutrition-related chronic diseases.
Recommendations were made to help prevent death and disability from major nutrition-related chronic diseases.
These population nutrient intake and physical activity goals should contribute in the development of regional strategies and national guidelines to reduce the burden of disease related to obesity, diabetes, cardiovascular disease, several forms of cancer, osteoporosis and dental disease.
The Expert Report urges national governments to aim for dietary guidelines that are simple, realistic and food-based.
Finland and Japan, countries that have actively intervened in the diet and nutritional behavior of their populations, have witnessed dramatic decreases in risk factors and plunging rates of chronic disease.
Recognizing that chronic diseases are preventable, addressing the issues and creating an environment which supports health, the Report says, is the key to reducing rates of deaths and disability from chronic diseases.
The process should establish working relationships between communities and governments, encourage local initiatives affecting schools and the workplace and also involve the food industry.
NEGOTIATING HEALTH SERVICES IN TRADE AND INTEGRATION AGREEMENTS IN THE AMERICAS
Source: Pan American Health Organization (PAHO), Debra J. Lipson, with Ross Duncan and Soledad Salvador, January 2003 Non-USG Publication
The purpose of this document is to advance understanding of how trade and integration agreements can affect the health care system, and support capacity-building in the health sector to participate in negotiating trade and integration agreements.
It explains the rules concerning trade in services of major trade agreements at the global and regional level, explores how they could affect health care and policy, and provides a framework and options for managing trade in health services.
By educating health officials about services trade negotiations, it supports PAHO's objective in its 2003-2007 Strategic Plan for technical cooperation that results in an: "increase the number of countries able to demonstrate inclusion of health priorities in . . .the negotiation and implementation of trade and integration agreements at global, regional, sub-regional, and national levels."
Because many trade and integration agreements are broadly inclusive of all service sectors, they may inadvertently permit greater entry by foreign nationals into health service markets than country health officials want or are prepared to deal with.
On the other hand, if a country wants to expand foreign markets for their health service suppliers or allow greater foreign entry into their own health service markets, trade and integration agreements constitute a key policy lever.
International Criminal Court/Peace Keeping
WHAT DOES INTERNATIONAL LAW SAY ABOUT PRISONERS OF WAR?
Source: Council on Foreign Relations, updated March 26, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Brief overview of international law regarding prisoners of war, including links to major international conventions.
United Nations Peace Operations Report Progress in All Regions
Source: UN, Jan. 7, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Ranging in function from disarmament to protecting human rights, United Nations peace operations yielded major dividends for a number of countries in 2002, according to the report "Year in Review: U.N. Peace Operations 2002" released by the U.N. Department for Public Information December 31.
more
Information Technology/E-Commerce
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page THE GLOBAL COURSE OF THE INFORMATION REVOLUTION: RECURRING THEMES AND REGIONAL VARIATIONS
Source: Rand, Richard O. Hundley, Robert H. Anderson, Tora K. Bikson, C. Richard Neu, July 16, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Advances in information technology are heavily influencing ways in which business, society, and government work and function throughout the globe, bringing many changes to everyday life, in a process commonly termed the "information revolution."
This book paints a picture of the state of the information revolution today and how it will likely progress in the near- to mid-term future (10 to 15 years), focusing separately on different regions of the worldNorth America, Europe, the Asia-Pacific region, Latin America, the Middle East and North Africa, and sub-Saharan Africa.
The ability to acquire and use knowledge will be critical for success in the information society, as knowledge work constitutes an increasing proportion of all work in the long-term future.
Accordingly, developing human capital appropriately is key.
A quality education for all will be one of the keys to a nations success in the information age.
This presents different challenges in different parts of the world.
Globalization, boosted by the information revolution, will continue to have multivalenced social and cultural effects.
While its economic effects are widely recognized, knowledgeable observers also give considerable weight to its societal implicationsboth positive and negative.
These include further widening of the gap between the political/intellectual/economic elites and others in developing nations, and the globalization of entertainment and, consequently, styles (or at least fads), which leads those in some countries to feel that their own national cultures are being vitiated.
Global Software Piracy 2003
Source: Business Software Alliance, June 3, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The global piracy rate for commercial software has decreased 10 points over the last eight years, supported by piracy declines in all regions of the world, according to the Business Software Alliances (BSA) eighth annual survey on global software piracy.
Intensified education efforts are critical to shrinking the piracy problem further, BSA said.
According to this report, global software piracy rate declined to 39% in 2002, below its 1994 all-time high of 49%.
Worldwide, every country except Zimbabwe has reduced its rate of piracy since 1994, the year in which the study was first commissioned.
The U.S. piracy rate hit an all-time low of 23%, currently the lowest piracy rate in the world.
THE INFORMATION REVOLUTION IN ASIA
Source: RAND, Nina Hachigian and Lily Wu, May 13, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This report discusses the information revolution in the Asia-Pacific region and its likely course over the next five to ten years.
Key questions addressed in this report include the extent to which the information revolution has taken hold of markets in this region, the political implications of the information revolution for Asian governments, the variations between individual countries, and the prospects for further information-technology-related developments in the region.
REGULATION AND INTERNET USE IN DEVELOPING COUNTRIES
Source: AEI-Brookings Joint Center for Regulatory Studies, Scott Wallsten, May 2003 Non-USG Publication
Concerns about a worsening digital divide between rich and poor countries parallel the hope that information and computing technologies (ICTs) could increase economic growth in developing countries.
Little research, however, has explored ICT growth beyond noting that it is correlated with standard development indicators, and no empirical research has explored the role of regulation.
In this paper, Scott Wallsten uses data from a unique new survey of telecommunications regulators and other sources to measure the effects of regulation on Internet development.
Controlling for factors such as income, telecommunications infrastructure development, ubiquity of personal computers, and time trends, Mr. Wallsten finds that countries requiring formal regulatory approval for Internet Service Providers (ISPs) to operate have fewer Internet users and hosts than countries that do not require such approval.
Moreover, countries that regulate ISP final-user prices have higher Internet access prices than countries without such regulations.
These results suggest that developing countries own regulatory policies can have large impacts on the digital divide.
BROADBAND INTERNET ACCESS: BACKGROUND AND ISSUES
Source: CRS Report, Angele A. Gilroy and Lennard G. Kruger, Library of Congress, updated May 5, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Broadband or high-speed Internet access is provided by a series of technologies that give users the ability to send and receive data at volumes and speeds far greater than current Internet access over traditional telephone lines.
Currently, a number of telecommunications companies are developing, installing, and marketing specific technologies and services to provide broadband access to the home.
Meanwhile, the federal government - through Congress and the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) - is seeking to ensure fair competition among the players so that broadband will be available and affordable in a timely manner to all Americans who want it.
Broadband access, along with the content and services it might enable, has the potential to transform the Internet - both what it offers and how it is used.
For example, a two-way high speed connection could be used for interactive applications such as online classrooms, showrooms, or health clinics, where teacher and student (or customer and salesperson, doctor and patient) can see and hear each other through their computers.
An always on connection could be used to monitor home security, home automation, or even patient health remotely through the Web.
The high speed and high volume that broadband offers could also be used for bundled service where, for example, cable television, video on demand, voice, data, and other services are all offered over a single line.
In truth, it is possible that many of the applications that will best exploit the technological capabilities of broadband, while also capturing the imagination of consumers, have yet to be developed.
The Ever-Shifting Internet Population: A new look at Internet access and the digital divide · pdf
Source: Pew Internet Project, Pew Internet and American Life, April 16, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The percentage of Americans using the Internet has remained steady between 57 and 61 percent for the last two years, ending the steady yearly increases in usage seen prior to that time.
The findings released April 16 on online behavior come from the Pew Internet and American Life Project, a nonprofit research organization conducting periodic studies of the online world.
The Internet and the Iraq war.
How online Americans have used the Internet to learn war news, understand events, and promote their views · pdf
Source: Pew Internet Project, Pew Internet and American Life, April 1, 2003 Non-USG Publication
In the first six days after hostilities began in Iraq, the Pew Internet 
This report discusses how the Internet has grown as a news source for millions, how supporters and opponents of the war are using the Internet differently and how Americans are using email to debate, express concerns and show their patriotism.
E-COMMERCE AND DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2002
Source: United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD), February 2003 Non-USG Publication
In contrast with the weak performance of several key developed and developing economies in recent months and the difficulties experienced by the information technology (IT) sector, Internet use and particularly electronic commerce have continued to grow at a fast pace since the publication of the E-Commerce and Development Report 2001.
The number of Internet users worldwide is expected to reach 655 million by the end of 2002.
Developing countries accounted for almost one third of new Internet users worldwide in 2001.
In most of them, however, Internet penetration rates remain very low.
As for e-commerce, the report presents three estimates of global online sales.
In the most optimistic forecast, e-commerce would represent about 18 per cent of worldwide business-to-business and retail transactions in 2006.
The effects of Internet-induced changes in the global economy and their implications for developing countries will depend to a significant extent on factors that policy-makers, business players and other stakeholders can influence.
Policies must be designed, articulated in coherent e-strategies and implemented in partnership with all the relevant players to ensure that the new opportunities for creating, transforming, applying and exchange information and value are used to improve the productivity of developing economies and their enterprises.
The National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace
Source: The White House, Feb. 14, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The White House has issued a National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace, which identifies steps that government, private companies, and individuals can take to protect the information infrastructure -- collectively labeled cyberspace -- that is critical to the security and well-being of the United States.
International Security
---
Middle East
This logo indicates that a new item has been added to the page ISLAMIST POLITICS IN IRAQ AFTER SADDAM HUSSEIN
Source: United States Institute of Peace (USIP).
Graham E. Fuller.
August 2003 Non-USG Publication
This report makes one major assumption: with the end of Baathist repression and new political openings there are no grounds for believing that newly emerging Iraqi politics will dramatically depart from the many familiar patterns of general politics in the Arab world.
To be sure, every country is unique, and Iraq has had its own quite special experience over the past five decades.
History, geography, and geopolitics furthermore put their distinctive stamp on any country.
Nonetheless, there are some general patterns of politics and aspirations across the Arab world to which a freer Iraq will not likely be a stranger.
One of these major characteristics is that in most of the Arab world Islamist movements constitute the most important, if not the sole, segment of opposition to existing regimes.
Political Islam will thus strongly emerge in post-Hussein Iraqindeed, there are clear indications that they already have.
But an important qualification is essential here: Islamist parties also benefit immensely from the absence of other rivalsas repressive states close down all opposition groups.
In today's Iraq, some degree of political competition will be present that will set some limits to any Islamist monopoly on politics.
But what forms will these trends take and how will they interact with other forces in the country? This report examines three major Islamist trends that operate within Iraq's three major sectarian/ethnic communities: the majority Shia Arabs, the Sunni Arabs, and the Kurds.
This logo indicates that a new item has been added to the page The Al-Jazeera News Network: Opportunity or Challenge for U.S. Foreign Policy in the Middle East?
Source: U.S. Congressional Research Service, Jeremy M. Sharp Middle East Policy Analyst Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, Updated July 23, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Al-Jazeera, the Arab worlds first all-news network was started by the Persian Gulf monarchy of Qatar.
It has come to be recognized as a key player in covering issues of central importance to U.S. foreign policy in the Middle East: the conflict in Iraq, the war on terrorism, and the Israeli-Palestinian conflict.
Al-Jazeera has become so publicly influential that U.S. officials now regularly appear on the network.
Although Al-Jazeera has received praise for its uncensored format and for airing interviews with U.S. and Israeli officials, as well as Arab critics of the policies of Arab governments, it has drawn criticism from many observers in the United States and elsewhere for a perceived lack of objectivity in covering these conflicts, including the activities of Al Qaeda.
For their part, officials from Al-Jazeera have claimed that theymerely reflect Arab popular resentment of U.S. policy in the Middle East.
This logo indicates that a new item has been added to the page ASSESSING THE IMPACT OF U.S.-ISRAELI RELATIONS ON THE ARAB WORLD
Source: U.S. Army War College, Strategic Studies Institute, Lenore G. Martin, July 2003 Non-USG Publication
Pro-Western Arab regimes fear the backlash from their populations who are angered by the harsh Israeli occupation of the West Bank and Gaza and the failure of the United States to compel Israel to create a viable Palestinian state.
This monograph explores the interplay of the national interests of the United States, Israel, and the Arab world.
It analyzes the challenges to current American policies in the Middle East created by the interrelationships of radical Arab regimes, Israel, and the moderate Arab states.
According to the author, the current U.S. administration, with its focus on combating radical Islamic terrorism and stabilizing Iraq, has tilted the balance towards Israel.
This has serious consequences for Americas relations with Egypt, Jordan, and the states of the Gulf Cooperation Council.
Although these moderate Arab states all depend on the United States for their security from external threats, they all confront internal challenges to the legitimacy of their regimes.
Saudi Arabia in particular faces intense criticism from radical Islamists who resent Americas support of Israel and have demanded the complete expulsion of infidel forces, as well as facing the calls for more political participation from sectors in the Saudi elite.
Moreover, Washington has downplayed the Saudi peace plan in favor of a peace process described by the road map to peace.
AFTER VICTORY: TOWARD A NEW MILITARY POSTURE IN THE PERSIAN GULF
Source: Cato Institute, Christopher Preble, June 10, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The author advocates an ever-decreasing permanent U.S. military presence in the Persian Gulf region.
In addition to the removal of troops from Saudi Arabia, he states that U.S. forces should be withdrawn from other Gulf states, including Qatar, Kuwait, and Iraq, and the U.S. Navy should terminate its long-standing policy of deploying a carrier battle group in the Persian Gulf.
The United States need not have troops stationed in the Persian Gulf in order to remain engaged in the region.
The Gulf's energy resources are important to the global economy, but goods and services flow on the world market absent explicit "protection" by military forces.
Further, the United States will continue to exert a stabilizing influence from a distance by drawing on its economic assets and its political standing.
In the highly unlikely event that regional conditions threaten vital U.S. security interests, the United States can draw on the military's capacity for projecting force over great distances.
IS GRADUALISM POSSIBLE? CHOOSING A STRATEGY FOR PROMOTING DEMOCRACY IN THE MIDDLE EAST
Source: Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Carnegie Endowment Working Paper No. 39, Thomas Carothers, June 2003 Non-USG Publication
As part of the changed U.S. geostrategic outlook arising from the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks against the United States, the Bush administration is giving greatly heightened attention to the issue of promoting democracy in the Middle East.
Although a policy of coercive regime change has been applied in Iraq, the administration has pursued a more gradualist model of political change in most of the region.
There is still little consensus among U.S. policy makers regarding the best approach for implementing democracy.
This working paper assesses three competing strategies that have emerged within the growing domain of gradualist pro-democratic policies and programs.
The Middle East Peace Talks
Source: CRS Report, Carol Migdalovitz, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated May 16, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The end of the Cold War, the decline of the Soviet Union, and the U.S.-led victory in the Gulf war facilitated the beginning of a new peace process in 1991.
Israel and the Palestinians discussed a 5-year period of interim selfrule leading to a final settlement.
Israel and Syria discussed Israeli withdrawal from the Golan Heights in exchange for peace.
Israel and Jordan discussed relations.
Israel and Lebanon focused on Israels withdrawal from its self-declared security zone in south Lebanon and reciprocal Lebanese actions.
Israel: U.S. Foreign Assistance
Source: CRS Report, Clyde R. Mark, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated May 14, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Israel is not economically self-sufficient, and relies on foreign assistance and borrowing to maintain its economy.
Since 1985, the United States has provided $3 billion in grants annually to Israel.
Since 1976, Israel has been the largest annual recipient of U.S. foreign assistance, and is the largest cumulative recipient since World War II.
In addition to U.S. assistance, it is estimated that Israel receives about $1 billion annually through philanthropy, an equal amount through short- and long- term commercial loans, and around $1 billion in Israel Bonds proceeds.
Israeli-United States Relations
Source: CRS Report, Clyde R. Mark, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated May 14, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Israeli-U.S. relations are an important factor in U.S. policy in the Middle East, and Congress has placed considerable importance on the maintenance of a close and supportive relationship.
The main vehicle for expressing support for Israel has been foreign aid; Israel currently receives about $3 billion per year in economic and military grants, refugee settlement assistance, and other aid.
Congress has monitored the aid issue closely along with other issues in bilateral relations, and its concerns have affected Administrations policies.
Syria: U.S. Relations and Bilateral Issues
Source: CRS Report, Alfred B. Prados Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated May 13, 2003 USG: Official Publications
An array of bilateral issues continue to affect relations between the United States and Syria: the course of Arab-Israeli talks; questions of arms proliferation; Syrian connections with terrorist activity and previous involvement in narcotics traffic; Syrias human rights record; Syrias role in Lebanon; and a warming trend in Syrian relations with Iraq.
A variety of U.S. legislative provisions and executive directives prohibit direct aid to Syria and restrict bilateral trade relations between the two countries.
Syria has reportedly cooperated with the United States in investigating Osama bin Ladens Al Qaeda organization in the aftermath of the September 11 attacks but has been unwilling to sever connections with some other terrorist organizations.
On April 10, 2003, Representatives Ileana Ros-Lehtinen and Eliot Engel introduced the Syria Accountability and Lebanese Sovereignty Restoration Act of 2003.
According to a statement by Representative Engels office, this bill holds Syria accountable for its support for terrorism, occupation of Lebanon, and possession and continued development of weapons of mass destruction.
The Road Ahead Lessons in Nation Building from Japan, Germany, and Afghanistan for Postwar Iraq
Source: USIP, Ray Salvatore Jennings, May 2003 Non-USG Publication
With the war in Iraq has come the responsibility to win the peace.
Military planners have demonstrated that rapid deployment of special operations personnel and judicious use of traditional military assets designed to contend with every reasonable contingency are appropriate for modern wars with countries such as Iraq.
A similar doctrine is also appropriate in the wake of such wars, especially during the critical eighteen-month window that begins with the first day of the peace, when postwar environments are most vulnerable to instability and a relapse into violence.
Germany, Japan, and Afghanistan offer several positive and negative lessons on appropriate policy and behavior during a period of military governance in Iraq.
IRAQI MOBILE BIOLOGICAL WARFARE AGENT PRODUCTION PLANTS
Source: United States Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) and United States Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), May 28, 2003 USG: Official Publications
From the Overview section of this report: Coalition forces have uncovered the strongest evidence to date that Iraq was hiding a biological warfare program.
* Kurdish forces in late April 2003 took into custody a specialized tractor-trailer near Mosul and subsequently turned it over to US military control.
* The US military discovered a second mobile facility equipped to produce BW agent in early May at the al-Kindi Research, Testing, Development, and Engineering facility in Mosul.
Although this second trailer appears to have been looted, the remaining equipment, including the fermentor, is in a configuration similar to the first plant.
* US forces in late April also discovered a mobile laboratory truck in Baghdad.
The truck is a toxicology laboratory from the 1980s that could be used to support BW or legitimate research.
The design, equipment, and layout of the trailer found in late April is strikingly similar to descriptions provided by a source who was a chemical engineer that managed one of the mobile plants.
Secretary of State Powell's description of the mobile plants in his speech in February 2003 to the United Nations was based primarily on reporting from this source.
The Military Balance in the Middle East: An Analytical Overview.
Military Expenditures and Arms Transfers, Major Arms by Country and Zone, and Qualitative Trends
Source: Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), Anthony H. Cordesman, with assistance from G. Ryan Faith, updated and Web-posted May 9, 2003 Non-USG Publication
In this report, the author offers a detailed "net assessment" of Middle Eastern military efforts and forces.
The report combines data on the trends in defense efforts, spending, procurement, R
This detailed overview also examines the effects and implications of modern warfare on effective and perceived military strengths as well as arms purchases.
Finally, the report examines issues associated with the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction in an environment that increasingly favors asymmetric warfare.
Weapons of Mass Destruction in the Middle East: Regional Trends, National Forces, Warfighting Capabilities, Delivery Options, and Weapons Effects
Source: Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), Anthony H. Cordesman, with assistance from G. Ryan Faith, updated and Web-posted May 9, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Cordesman provides a detailed, 160-page description of the trends in proliferation, including long-range missiles, chemical, biological, radiological and nuclear forces, and their impact on the regional military balance and arms control.
It includes detailed descriptions of the delivery systems, and chemical, biological, radiological, and nuclear force developments in Algeria, Libya, Egypt, Israel, Syria, Iran and Iraq, the Sudan.
This report also examines the reasons that states pursue non-conventional armaments, as well as the instabilities created by such efforts.
The specific weapons themselves are also discussed in detail, creating thorough background necessary to understand fully the threats that WMD pose to peace.
These inspections of both proliferation efforts and the effects of WMD are tied together in an appraisal of how and why states and non-state actors pursue and may, someday, use WMD in this increasingly volatile region.
LIBERALIZATION VERSUS DEMOCRACY: UNDERSTANDING ARAB POLITICAL REFORM
Source: Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Daniel Brumberg, May 2003 Non-USG Publication
According to the author, no administration has talked more about democracy in the Middle East than the Bush administration.
The president and his advisors have spoken optimistically about a post-Saddam democracy in Iraq, one that might eventually become a veritable light to other Arab nations.
This grand vision assumes that sooner or later, advocates of democracy throughout the Middle East will demand the same freedoms and rights that Iraqis are now claiming.
Yet, however inspiring this vision appears, the actual reform plan that the administration has thus far set out is unlikely to produce radical changes in the Arab world.
As Secretary of State Colin Powell suggested in his November 2002 Middle East Partnership Initiative, and in the subsequent statement he gave to the Arab press, the United States will work with Arab leaders to carefully and slowly reform their autocracies.
Regardless how dramatic the change in Baghdad is, when it comes to our friends in Egypt, Jordan, Kuwait, Morocco, and Yemen, the administrations reform plan points to evolution rather than revolution.
Blueprint for Freedom: Limiting the Role of the United Nations in Post-War Iraq
Source: Heritage Foundation, Nile Gardiner, Ph.D., and David B. Rivkin, Jr., Esq.
Executive Summary #1646, April 21, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The U.N. is slowly dying as a force on the world stage and will go the way of the League of Nations unless it is radically reformed and restructured.
It failed spectacularly to deal with the growing threat posed by Saddam Hussein, and its influence may well diminish further in the coming years.
Indeed, what happens to the U.N. in the future very much depends upon how it behaves here and now.
President Bush should make it clear that no further discussions on the Iraq issue are needed at the U.N.
Indeed, the role of the United Nations in a post-war Iraq should be limited to purely humanitarian involvement.
The United States and the United Kingdom should take the lead in administering a post-war Iraqi transition government, with the U.N. playing only a subordinate role.
Iraq: Duty to the Future
Source: U.S. Dept of State, April 2003 USG: Official Publications
FROM SECRETARY OF STATE COLIN POWELL:
The "Future of Iraq Project," described in this publication, embodies our government's long-standing desire to help Iraqis in their effort to free their country from tyranny.
Over many months, the Project has brought together Free Iraqis who are fortunate enough not to live under Saddam Hussein's rule and who have expertise in a wide range of professions.
They have boldly discussed concrete proposals for the rebuilding of their country and the restructuring of its institutions so that Iraq can rightfully retake its place as a leading nation in the region and beyond.
IRAQ: RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE OCCUPYING POWERS
Source: Amnesty International, April 16, 2003 Non-USG Publication
International law on belligerent occupation does not address the question of the legality of occupation.
Its rules apply to any occupying power for the sole fact that it is in control of a foreign territory, whatever the reason for this situation.
Recognizing the applicability of such a law to a given situation does not constitute a judgment on the legal status of the territory concerned.
The provisions of the law on belligerent occupation are found in international humanitarian law, also known as the laws of war or the laws on armed conflict.
As such, they take into account the military and security concerns of the occupying power, balancing them against the rights of those who find themselves under its authority.
THE INSTANT LESSONS OF THE IRAQ WAR.
MAIN REPORT, THIRD WORKING DRAFT
Source: Center for Strategic and International Studies, Anthony H. Cordesman, April 14, 2003 Non-USG Publication
After a review of what are still unknown factors in the war in Iraq, the author assesses the strengths of specific coalition assets that have provided them a formidable advantage.
Among the coalition strengths, Cordesman notes: competence and flexibility in war planning; the value of training and readiness; intelligence assets; coordination of air, ground and naval operations.
Establishing the Rule of Law in Iraq
Source: USIP, April 2003 Non-USG Publication
A new Special Report suggests steps to ensure that post-conflict reconciliation and reconstruction in Iraq go forward successfully.
Syria: U.S. Relations and Bilateral Issues
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Alfred B. Prados, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated April 11, 2003 USG: Official Publications
An array of bilateral issues continue to affect relations between the United States and Syria: the course of Arab-Israeli talks; questions of arms proliferation; Syrian connections with terrorist activity and previous involvement in narcotics traffic; Syrias human rights record; Syrias role in Lebanon; and a warming trend in Syrian relations with Iraq.
A variety of U.S. legislative provisions and executive directives prohibit direct aid to Syria and restrict bilateral trade relations between the two countries.
Syria has reportedly cooperated with the United States in investigating Osama bin Ladens Al Qaeda organization in the aftermath of the September 11 attacks but has been unwilling to sever connections with some other terrorist organizations.
On April 10, 2003, Representatives Ileana Ros-Lehtinen and Eliot Engel introduced the Syria Accountability and Lebanese Sovereignty Restoration Act of 2003.
According to a statement by Representative Engels office, this bill holds Syria accountable for its support for terrorism, occupation of Lebanon, and possession and continued development of weapons of mass destruction.
DOES THE CONSTITUTION FOLLOW THE FLAG?: IRAQ, THE WAR ON TERROR, AND THE REACH OF THE LAW
Source: Kal Raustiala, FindLaws Legal Commentary, April 9, 2003 Non-USG Publication
A bedrock principle of American democracy is that the Constitution defines and limits our government.
Yet does the Constitution constrain the exercise of government power abroad? For instance, would it constrain the U.S. if we occupy Iraq after the war ends? Moreover, the question of the Constitution's extraterritorial reach itself is perhaps misleading.
The Constitution certainly applies globally.
The real question is how it applies, and whether specific rights guaranteed by the Constitution are somehow territorially-limited.
Existing precedents suggest that they are.
Even when the U.S. annexes territory, inhabitants of the territory do not necessarily enjoy the full protection of the Constitution.
Meanwhile, when the U.S. occupies foreign territory, pursuant to military action, or leases territory, pursuant to a treaty, the constitutional constraints are even weaker--some would say non-existent.
This commentary provides an interesting review of issues facing the U. S. government in Iraq, as well as the legal status of prisoners housed at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba.
Iraq: U.S. Military Operations
Source: CRS Report for Congress, by Steve Bowman, Specialist in National Defense, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated April 7, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Iraqs chemical, biological, and nuclear weapons programs, together with Iraqi long-range missile development and support for terrorism, are the primary justifications put forward by the Bush Administration for military action.
Since Iraq originally ended cooperation with U.N. inspectors in 1998, there has been little information on the state of Iraqs weapons of mass destruction (WMD) arsenal; however, Administration officials are convinced that Iraq has reconstituted significant capabilities.
On March 17, 2003 President Bush issued an ultimatum demanding that Saddam Hussein and his sons depart from Iraq within 48 hours.
On March 19, offensive operations began with air strikes against Iraqi leadership positions.
Iraq: U.S. Regime Change Efforts and the Iraqi Opposition
Source: CRS Report for Congress, by Kenneth Katzman, Specialist in Middle Eastern Affairs, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated April 7, 2003 USG: Official Publications
In his 2002 and 2003 State of the Union messages, President Bush characterized Iraq as a grave potential threat to the United States because of its refusal to abandon its weapons of mass destruction (WMD) programs as required by U.N. Security Council resolutions and the potential for it to transfer WMD to terrorist groups.
Since September 2002, the President has said that unless Iraq fully disarms in cooperation with United Nations weapons inspectors, the United States would lead a coalition to achieve that disarmament militarily.
U.S. officials have made clear that this would include the ouster of Iraqs President Saddam Husseins regime.
On March 17, 2003, the United States launched Operation Iraqi Freedom, a war effort to disarm Iraq and change its regime.
EYE ON IRAQ: WAR UPDATE
Source: Center for Defense Information (CDI), updated March 28, 2003 USG: Official Publications
This site, updated regularly, consists of a summary of events in Iraq.
It includes data on military developments in various parts of Iraq and casualty reports, as well as links to maps, articles and other information on Operation Iraqi Freedom.
The Center for Defense Information is a non-partisan, non-profit organization committed to independent research on the social, economic, environmental, political and military components of global security.
POLITICAL RECONSTRUCTION IN IRAQ: A REALITY CHECK
Source: Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Marina Ottaway and Judith Yaphe, March 27, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Plans for the political reconstruction of Iraq are bound to fail if they do not take into consideration that Iraq is not a political blank slate to be transformed at American will into a democratic, secular, pluralist, and federal state.
It is a difficult country with multiple social groups and power centers with conflicting agendas.
The United States must not try to impose a system of its own devising on these groups.
Loose talk about bringing democracy to Iraq confuses what external actors can do and what Iraqis alone can accomplish.
The United States should also not underestimate the extent to which broader U.S. policies toward the Middle East and its handling of Iraq's oil will affect the willingness of parties within and outside Iraq to cooperate in its peaceful reconstruction.
Washington's next steps in the Israeli-Palestinian conflict, in relations with Iran, and in shaping a new regional security system will determine whether the Iraq war is the beginning or the end of regional crisis and bloodshed.
POST-WAR IRAQ: ARE WE READY
Source: Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS), Bathsheba N. Crocker, March 25, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Bush Administration has done considerable planning for the postwar phase in Iraq, and comprehensive preparations on many fronts have been made in advance.
Nonetheless, significant gaps remain.
This document sets forth a scorecard of the Administrations preparations for the post-conflict reconstruction phase thus far, drawing on all available information the Administration has chosen to make public.
The issues addressed below draw and build upon the recommendations in A Wiser Peace: An Action Strategy for a Post-Conflict Iraq, published by the Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS) in mid-January 2003.
Overall, this scorecard gives the Administration a mixed grade on its planning and preparations, which have been significant in certain areas but are still seriously lagging in others.
War Powers Resolution: Presidential Compliance
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Richard F. Grimmett, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated March 24, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Two separate but closely related issues confront Congress each time the President introduces armed forces into a situation abroad that conceivably could lead to their involvement in hostilities.
One issue concerns the division of war powers between the President and Congress, whether the use of armed forces falls within the purview of the congressional power to declare war and the War Powers Resolution.
The other issue is whether Congress concurs in the wisdom of the action.
This issue brief does not deal with the substantive merits of using armed forces in specific cases, but rather with the congressional authorization for the action and the application and effectiveness of the War Powers.
"COALITION OF THE WILLING" ALREADY LARGER THAN THE 1991 GULF WAR COALITION
Source: Heritage Foundation, Paolo Pasicolan and Carrie Satterlee, March 19, 2003 Non-USG Publication
List to date, according to Heritage, of the 42 countries that have joined the Coalition of the Willing, not including 15 countries that have offered quiet support.
A VIEW FROM THE ARAB WORLD: A SURVEY IN FIVE COUNTRIES
Source: Brookings Institution, Shibley Telhami, March 13, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Under the sponsorship of the Sadat Chair for Peace and Development at the University of Maryland, Shibley Telhami prepared a public opinion survey for Zogby International, which interviewed 2,620 men and women in Egypt, Morocco, Saudi Arabia, Lebanon and Jordan.
The survey was conducted between February 19 and March 11.
It focuses on perceptions of the United States in specific political scenarios and on views of United States policy abroad.
Previous polls done by Shibley Telhami and by Zogby International in the Middle East showed that neither United States policy nor the United States was viewed favorably.
Very few people in the survey countries have a favorable opinion of the United States: Only 4% in Saudi Arabia, 6% in Morocco and Jordan, 13% in Egypt, and 32% in Lebanon.
Most people say that their attitudes toward the U.S. are based on American policies, not on American values.
Despite the U.S. claim that it intends to spread democratic values and ideals throughout the world, war with Iraq will bring less democracy in the view of 95% of Saudis, 66% of Moroccans, 60% of Egyptians, 58% of Jordanians, and 74% of Lebanese.
DISARMING IRAQ BY FORCE: WMD STAKES AND SCENARIOS
Source: Monterey Institute of International Studies, Center for Nonproliferation Studies (CNS), Michael Barletta, March 7, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Anticipating the consequences of the coming conflict is not a simple matter.
The stakes in the coming clash include a wide range of possible positive and negative consequences.
Of these, we can at best estimate which will most likely happen, which may ensue, and which are unlikely to occur.
However, systematically estimating the likelihood of costs and benefits can aid in anticipating events, and offer a pragmatic basis for favoring or opposing war, as compared to alternative courses of action to address WMD threats posed by Iraq.
International Law and the Preemptive Use of Force Against Iraq
Source: CRS Report for Congress, David M. Ackerman, Legislative Attorney, American Law Division, updated March 17, 2003 USG: Official Publications
In his speech to the United Nations on September 12, 2002, President Bush described the regime of Saddam Hussein in Iraq as a grave and gathering danger, detailed that regimes persistent efforts to acquire weapons of mass destruction and its persistent defiance of numerous Security Council resolutions requiring Iraq to disarm, and raised the specter of an outlaw regime providing such weapons to terrorists.
The President left little doubt that, with or without UN support, the United States would act to force Iraq to disarm and otherwise abide by its past commitments, and that military force might well be used to accomplish that objective.
One issue raised by that policy is the legality of the preemptive use of force under international law.
This report examines that issue as developed in customary international law and under the United Nations Charter.
It will be updated as events warrant.
(For historical information on the preemptive use of force by the U.S., see CRS Report RS21311, U.S. Use of Preemptive Use of Force.
Iraq: Divergent Views on Military Action
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Alfred B. Prados, Specialist in Middle East Affairs, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated March 17, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Officials of the Bush Administration believe military action against Iraq may be necessary to eliminate threats posed by the Iraqi regime to the U.S. and international communities.
In October 2002, Congress passed a joint resolution (H.J.Res.
114) giving the President authority to use force if necessary to eliminate threats posed by Saddam Husseins Iraq.
Some Members of Congress, commentators, and analysts question the Administrations rationale for military action or favor delaying it to allow U.N. weapons inspectors more time to complete their findings in Iraq.
This report summarizes arguments advanced by the Administration and by critics of the Administrations position.
It will be updated as the situation continues to develop.
For further reading, see CRS Report RL31339, Iraq: U.S. Efforts to Change the Regime, by Kenneth Katzman.
Iraq: The Day After
Source: Report of an Independent Task Force on Post-Conflict Iraq Sponsored by the Council on Foreign Relations, Thomas R. Pickering and James R. Schlesinger, Co-Chairs Eric P. Schwartz, Project Director, March 12, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The President should "make clear to the Congress, to the American people, and to the people of Iraq that the United States will stay the course" after a war in Iraq, concludes the Council-sponsored Independent Task Force, Iraq: the Day After.
Post-war stabilization and reconstruction could cost up to $20 billion a year for several years, and American public support is critical to sustaining that commitment.
Promoting Democracy in the Middle East: The Problem of U.S. Credibility
Source: Working Paper No. 35, Marina Ottaway, Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, March 2003 Non-USG Publication
After decades of giving relatively little attention to the possibility and problems of democracy in the Middle East, the U.S. foreign policy community has in the past year elevated the issue to a position of central importance.
In this working paper, Marina Ottaway highlights a problem of fundamental significancethe lack of credibility that the United States has in the Arab world when it presents itself as a pro-democratic actor.
Although many Americans may feel that America's bona fides as a pro-democratic actor are unquestionable, the stubborn fact remains that many people in other parts of the world, especially the Middle East, have a different opinion.
If left unaddressed, this credibility gap will undermine even the most well-intentioned efforts by the United States to promote positive political change in the region.
While recognizing that there are no instant solutions to this problem, the paper identifies ways the United States can begin to alleviate the gap and in so doing pave the way for a genuine, lasting democratic engagement with the Middle East.
Iraq's Voices for Freedom
Source: U.S. Dept of State, Feb 26, 2003 USG: Official Publications
This new publication of the State Department presents excerpts that were taken from interviews conducted in late 2002 with Iraqis now living beyond the brutal control of Saddam Hussein's rule.
These voices represent but a few of the millions of Iraqis whose hopes for the future have been silenced by tyranny.
Putting Noncombatants at Risk: Saddam's Use of Human Shields'"
Source: CIA, January 2003 USG: Official Publications
In past confrontations with the West, Iraqi President Saddam Husayn has used thousands of foreign and Iraqi civilians as human shields in bids to manipulate domestic and international opinion and deter military action against his regime.
This tactic has produced clear costs and only marginal gains for Saddam, yet he repeatedly has enacted variations of it since Iraq's invasion of Kuwait in August 1990.
Palestinians and Middle East Peace: Issues for the United States
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Clyde Mark, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Feb. 24, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The United States began contacts with the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO) in December 1988, after the PLO accepted Israels right to exist, accepted U.N. Resolutions 242 and 338 that call for an exchange of land for peace, and renounced terrorism.
The United States continues its contacts with the PLO and the Palestinian Authority elected in January 1996, and is an active broker in the continuing Middle East peace process.
Iraq War? Current Situation and Issues for Congress
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Raymond W. Copson (Coordinator), Specialist in International Relations Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, Feb. 20, 2003 USG: Official Publications
On November 8, 2002, the United Nations Security Council, acting at U.S. urging, adopted Resolution 1441, giving Iraq a final opportunity to comply with its the disarmament obligations or face serious consequences.
During January 2003, the U.S. military buildup in the Persian Gulf continued, amid reports that U.S. forces would be ready to launch a war by mid-February or early March.
President Bush, other top U.S. officials, and British Prime Minister Tony Blair have indicated that Iraq has little time left to offer full cooperation with U.N. weapons inspectors.
However, the inspectors themselves, with leaders of France, Germany, and other countries, are urging that the inspections process be allowed more time.
The Administration asserts that Iraq is in defiance of 16 Security Council resolutions requiring that it fully declare and eliminate its weapons of mass destruction (WMD).
Skeptics, including many foreign critics, maintain that the Administration is exaggerating the Iraqi WMD threat.
Iraq: Weapons Threat, Compliance, Sanctions, and U.S. Policy
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Kenneth Katzman, Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Feb. 19, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The United States is currently attempting to maintain an international consensus for strict enforcement of all applicable U.N. Security Council resolutions on Iraq, and is threatening and preparing for military action against Iraq if Iraq does not soon disarm.
In the wake of the September 11 attacks, there has been heightened U.S. concern about the potential threat posed by Iraqs weapons of mass destruction programs and alleged ties to terrorist groups.
However, many governments say they would only support U.S. military action to disarm Iraq and, in the process, change Iraqs regime, if the action is taken with U.N. authorization.
Iraq: Map Sources
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Marilyn L. Nelson, Senior Research Librarian, Information Research Division, Feb. 13, 2003 USG: Official Publications
This report identifies selected Web sites for maps of Iraq.
Selected government, library, and organizational Web site addresses are provided.
Maps of the Middle East, Iraq, and the No-Fly Zone are also provided.
This report will be updated as needed.
Iraq: Divergent Views on Military Action
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Alfred B. Prados, Specialist in Middle East Affairs Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Jan. 31, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Officials of the Bush Administration believe military action against Iraq may be necessary to eliminate threats posed by the Iraqi regime to the U.S. and international communities.
In October 2002, Congress passed a joint resolution (H.J.Res.
114) giving the President authority to use force if necessary to eliminate threats posed by Saddam Husseins Iraq.
Some Members of Congress, commentators, and analysts question the Administrations rationale for military action or favor delaying it to allow U.N. weapons inspectors more time to complete their findings in Iraq.
This report summarizes arguments advanced by the Administration and by critics of the Administrations position.
It will be updated as the situation continues to develop.
For further reading, see CRS Report RL31339, Iraq: U.S. Efforts to Change the Regime, by Kenneth Katzman.
Would an Invasion of Iraq Be a "Just War"?
Source: USIP, January 2003 Non-USG Publication
A new Institute report examines whether an American attack on Iraq would satisfy Christian just war criteria.
During the months leading up to the Gulf War in 1991, there was considerable discussion of whether an American attack to oust Iraqi forces from Kuwait would satisfy Christian just war criteria.
Much less discussion of this question has occurred in recent months during which the United States and its allies have considered an invasion of Iraq.
In order to focus attention on this issue, the U.S. Institute of Peace organized a symposium on December 17, 2002 in which four presenters were asked to answer the question, "Would an invasion of Iraq be a "just war"?
IRAQ: WHAT NEXT?
Source: Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, Joseph Cirincione, Jessica T. Mathews and George Perkovich, with Miriam Rajkumar, Marshall Breit and Dipali Mukhopadhyay, January 2003 Non-USG Publication
The authors of this report conclude that, far from being exhausted, the inspections process has just begun.
Inspections should be pursued without ruling out future use of force.
Iraq's lack of full cooperation is a material breach, but not a casus belli.
As the report argues, "Disarmament achieved without a war would be an enormous-and enormously popular-achievement."
In the meantime, "Saddam Hussein is effectively incarcerated and under watch by a force that could respond immediately and devastatingly to his aggression."
However, if the aim is not, in fact, disarmament but regime change as a matter of principle, "then the inspection and disarmament processes now underway are largely irrelevant."
WHAT DOES DISARMAMENT LOOK LIKE?
Source: White House, Jan. 23, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The Bush administration has charged the Iraqi regime of Saddam Hussein with using an exhaustive program of concealment and deceit, staffed by thousands of Iraqis, to prevent U.N. weapons inspectors from finding elements of its vast weapons of mass destruction program, according to a new White House report.
APPARATUS OF LIES.
Saddam's Disinformation and Propaganda 1990-2003
Source: White House, Jan. 21, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The U.S. government has compiled a detailed report that discusses the Iraqi regime's use of propaganda and disinformation to gain international support for the regime and to hide development of its weapons of mass destruction programs, a senior administration official said January 21.
"The manipulation of public opinion is a high priority for Saddam Hussein's regime.
This report takes a broad look at Iraqi deception, illustrating Saddam's commitment to deception and his contempt for the truth," the official said.
Israel: U.S. Foreign Assistance
Source: CRS Report, Clyde R. Mark Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Jan. 16, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Israel is not economically self-sufficient, and relies on foreign assistance and borrowing to maintain its economy.
Since 1985, the United States has provided $3 billion in grants annually to Israel.
Since 1976, Israel has been the largest annual recipient of U.S. foreign assistance, and is the largest cumulative recipient since World War II.
In addition to U.S. assistance, it is estimated that Israel receives about $1 billion annually through philanthropy, an equal amount through short- and long- term commercial loans, and around $1 billion in Israel Bonds proceeds.
Israeli-United States Relations
Source: CRS Report, Clyde R. Mark Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Jan. 16, 2003 USG: Official Publications
Israeli-U.S. relations are an important factor in U.S. policy in the Middle East, and Congress has placed considerable importance on the maintenance of a close and supportive relationship.
The main vehicle for expressing support for Israel has been foreign aid; Israel currently receives about $3 billion per year in economic and military grants, refugee settlement assistance, and other aid.
Congress has monitored the aid issue closely along with other issues in bilateral relations, and its concerns have affected Administrations policies.
The Middle East Peace Talks
Source: CRS Report, Carol Migdalovitz Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated Jan. 14, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The end of the Cold War, the decline of the Soviet Union, and the U.S.-led victory in the Gulf war facilitated the beginning of a new peace process in 1991.
Israel and the Palestinians discussed a 5-year period of interim selfrule leading to a final settlement.
Israel and Syria discussed Israeli withdrawal from the Golan Heights in exchange for peace.
Israel and Jordan discussed relations.
Israel and Lebanon focused on Israels withdrawal from its self-declared security zone in south Lebanon and reciprocal Lebanese actions.
FACING SADDAM'S CHILD SOLDIERS
Source: Brookings Institution, Iraq Memo #8, Peter W. Singer, Jan. 14, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Among the litany of human rights violations committed by Saddam Husayn [sic] is that his regime deliberately recruits children into its armed forces, in violation of both international law and widely accepted moral norms.
As a result, U.S. and allied forces must prepare for the fact that they will likely face child soldiers in a potential war with Iraq.
They must consider the costs and tough choices now, so that they do not later find themselves ill-equipped or untrained for the unique challenges that child soldiers present.
Iraq's employment of child soldiers will present a considerable challenge for U.S. public diplomacy, especially in the Arab world (but also at home), where images of coalition forces fighting Iraqi children could have profound consequences.
Missile Defense
---
NATO
---
South Asia
ASEAN REGIONAL FORUM: PROMOTING U.S. INTERESTS
Source: Heritage Foundation, Dana R. Dillon, Balbina Y.
Hwang, and John J. Tkacik, Jr., June 10, 2003 Non-USG Publication
On June 18, 2003, Secretary of State Colin Powell will attend the 10th annual ASEAN Regional Forum (ARF) in Phnom Penh, Cambodia.
ARF was created in 1994 by the countries of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) to "foster constructive dialogue and consultation on political and security issues of common interest and concern...and to make significant contributions to efforts towards confidence-building and preventive diplomacy in the Asia-Pacific region."
The authors suggest that Secretary Powell should do the following: Encourage greater cooperation on terrorism; Insist on military reform in Indonesia; Encourage peace talks between Manila and the Moro Islamic Liberation Front (MILF); Warn about the threat of maritime terrorism and encourage countries in the region to take action to protect their ports and territorial waters.
Meet with North Korea in a multilateral meeting that also includes South Korea, Japan, and China; Urge ARF to adopt measures to curtail North Korean proliferation activities; Ask China to address the North Korean refugee problem; Offer China refugee assistance and seek cooperation on refugees from other countries in the region; Restate America's commitment to freedom of navigation in the South China Sea; Support ASEAN's efforts to create a code of conduct that protects the security and economic well-being of countries littoral to the South China Sea; Seek an accord on the South China Sea, with or without China; and Recommend that ARF include defense ministers in its next annual meeting.
Terrorism
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page REPORT OF THE JOINT INQUIRY INTO THE TERRORIST ATTACKS OF SEPTEMBER 11, 2001
Source: U.S. House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence and U.S. Senate Select Committee on Intelligence, July 24, 2003 USG: Official Publications
This is the declassified version of the Final Report of the Joint Inquiry that was approved and filed with the House of Representatives and the Senate on December 20, 2002.
With the exception of portions that were released to the public previously (e.g., the additional views of Members, the GAO Anthrax Report, etc.), this version has been declassified by the Intelligence Community prior to its public release.
That review was for classification purposes only, and does not indicate Intelligence Community agreement with the accuracy of this report, or concurrence with its factual findings or conclusions.
This icon indicates that a new item has been added to the page Ensuring the Safety and Security of the Nation's Food Supply
Source: U.S. Food and Drug Administration, July 23 2003 USG: Official Publications
On July 23, 2003, the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) submitted to the Department of Health and Human Services Secretary Tommy G. Thompson this progress report entitled, "Ensuring the Safety and Security of the Nation's Food Supply," which summarizes the leadership demonstrated at FDA in combating the terrorist threat to foods.
AL QAEDA, TRENDS IN TERRORISM AND FUTURE POTENTIALITIES: AN ASSESSMENT
Source: RAND, Bruce Hoffman, June 2003 Non-USG Publication
This paper assesses current trends in terrorism and future potentialities.
It examines first the presumed state of al Qaeda today with particular reference to its likely agenda in a post-Iraq war world.
It then more broadly focuses on some key current terrorism trends in order to understand better both how terrorism is changing and what the implications of these changes are in terms of possible future attacks and patterns.
The discussion is organized along four key questions: What is the state of al-Qaida today and what effects have 18 months of unremitting war had on it? What are the challenges in countering this particular adversaryand, specifically, can al Qa'ida survive bin Laden? What do some other trends in terrorism today tell us about potential developments in the future? How should we be thinking about terrorism today and tomorrow?
Terrorism and National Security: Issues and Trends
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Raphael Perl Foreign Affairs, Defense, and Trade Division, updated May 12, 2003 USG: Official Publications
International terrorism has long been recognized as a serious foreign and domestic security threat.
This issue brief examines international terrorist actions and threats and the U.S. policy response.
Available policy options range from diplomacy, international cooperation, and constructive engagement to economic sanctions, covert action, physical security enhancement, and military force
HOMELAND SECURITY: A COMPENDIUM OF PUBLIC AND PRIVATE ORGANIZATIONS' POLICY RECOMMENDATIONS
Source: RAND, John V. Parachini, Lynn E. Davis, and Timothy Liston, web-posted May 8, 2003 Non-USG Publication
This paper presents various advisory groups major recommendations on strategic and substantive policy issues, which have not yet been adopted by the Bush Administration but that we feel warrant additional examination.
This paper uses as its framework the six critical mission areas and four foundations of homeland security, as defined in President Bushs National Strategy for Homeland Security.
The critical mission areas are intelligence and warning, border and transportation security, domestic counterterrorism emergency preparedness and response, protecting critical infrastructures and key assets, defending against catastrophic threats, and emergency preparedness and response (the authors address all but the last mission area in this paper).
The four foundations are the law, science and technology, information sharing and systems, and international cooperation (again, the authors address all but the last foundation).
Also included in the national strategy is a statement of basic principles to guide the allocation of funding for homeland security and a statement of priorities for the future of U.S. counterterrorism activities.
REGIONAL DEMOGRAPHICS AND THE WAR ON TERRORISM
Source: RAND, Brian Nichiporuk, February 2003, Web-posted April 22, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The ultimate success of the U.S. and allies on the war on terrorism will depend upon myriad variables.
Some, such as military capabilities and public support for military operations, are well known or easily discerned.
Others are less obvious, but will still be critical.
Among these are demographic trends in regions where counter-terror campaigns are being prosecuted, and the effectiveness of U.S. policies, formulated in response to these trends, to mitigate the appeal of Islamist extremism.
Terrorism and Development: Using Social and Economic Development to Inhibit a Resurgence of Terrorism
Source: RAND, Kim Cragin, Peter Chalk, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Abstract: This report examines the social and economic development policies enacted by three countries--Israel, the Philippines, and the United Kingdom--to inhibit a resurgence of terrorism within their jurisdictions.
Drawing on a broad research base, including numerous first-hand interviews, the authors outline the initiatives implemented by each country then assess their effectiveness, with the aim of informing U.S. decisionmakers of the benefits and pitfalls of such initiatives as they develop policy to counter terrorism.
Among their conclusions are the following: Social and economic development policies can weaken local support for terrorist activities and discourage terrorist recruits, and such policies can be used as a "stick" to discourage terrorism.
They caution, however, that the ability of these policies to inhibit terrorism depends on their implementation, and inadequately funded such policies are likely to renew support for terrorism.
GLOBALIZATIONS SECURITY IMPLICATIONS
Source: RAND, Lynn E. Davis., March 2003 Non-USG Publication
Globalization can promote prosperity, eradicate disease, and advance political freedom.
It can also promote transnational threats, including weapons of mass destruction.
This paper raises the broader issues arising from different aspects of globalization, focusing both on the threats and the opportunities, with the goal of suggesting very briefly a new way of approaching security in the coming decades.
Just as important, the paper tries to make the case that the national security and international economic policymaking communities each has a critical stake in what traditionally have been the responsibilities of the other.
The National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace
Source: The White House, Feb. 14, 2003 USG: Official Publications
The White House has issued a National Strategy to Secure Cyberspace, which identifies steps that government, private companies, and individuals can take to protect the information infrastructure -- collectively labeled cyberspace -- that is critical to the security and well-being of the United States.
Terrorist Threats to Food: Guidance for Establishing and Strengthening Prevention and Response Systems
Source: WHO, Jan. 30, 2003 Non-USG Publication
The World Health Organization (WHO) today published guidance intended to help national governments establish mechanisms, which will minimize potential terrorists acts against food supplies.
Terrorism, the Future, and U.S. Foreign Policy
Source: CRS Report for Congress, Rensselaer Lee 
IInternational terrorism has long been recognized as a foreign and domestic security threat.
The tragic events of September 11 in New York, the Washington, D.C., area, and Pennsylvania have dramatically re-energized the nations focus and resolve on terrorism.
This issue brief examines international terrorist actions and threats and the U.S. policy response.
Available policy options range from diplomacy, international cooperation, and constructive engagement to economic sanctions, covert action, physical security enhancement, and military force.
United Nations
---
U.S. Society and Values
Time for Equality at Work
Source: International Labour Organization, May 12, 2003 Non-USG Publication
Countries' failure to address persistent workplace discrimination make it more difficult to deal with challenges posed by increasing migration, diverse workforces and technological change, according to a new United Nations report.
In a May 12 press release announcing the release of "Time for Equality at Work," the U.N. International Labor Organization (ILO) said discrimination is becoming more subtle.
Forms of discrimination include pre-employment testing leading to a refusal to hire, testing of foreign visitors before being allowed into a country, dismissal without evidence, denial of health benefits, salary reduction and harassment, according to the release.
Many people suffer from "multiple discrimination," it said.
AGENDA 2003: SHAPING AMERICA'S FUTURE
Source: Heritage Foundation, Janvier 2003 Non-USG Publication
Heritage, a conservative think tank, outlines its agenda and policy recommendations for the coming year.
Agenda 2003 contains 28 concise chapters with 124 separate recommendations.
After approximately 20 pages of summary and introductory material, the report is split roughly evenly between domestic policy and foreign policy.
Line long
U.S. Government Publications Sites Think Tanks Publications Sites International Governmental PublicationsState and Local Publications
U.S. Government Publications Sites
* Northwestern university library U.S. Government Documents organized by U.S. Government Agency, organized by Title, organized by Subject.
* University of Michigan Document Center.
The Documents Center is a central reference and referral point for government information, whether local, state, federal, foreign or international.
Its web pages are a reference and instructional tool for government, political science, statistical data, and news.
* Superintendent of Documents: Aimed to keep the American public informed, the Government Printing Office provides links to government publications and databases.
* Government Printing Office Catalog of U.S Publications The Catalog is a search and retrieval service that provides bibliographic records of U.S. Government information resources.
* University of Memphis Uncle Sam MIGRATING GOVERNMENT PUBLICATIONS * University of Colorado - Boulder Government Publications The Government Publications Library provides information from all levels of government, including state and foreign governments and
